Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5786.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 66.20.010 and 2024 c 91 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:Upon application in the prescribed form being made to any employee authorized by the board to issue permits, accompanied by payment of the prescribed fee, and upon the employee being satisfied that the applicant should be granted a permit under this title, the employee must issue to the applicant under such regulations and at such fee as may be prescribed by the board a permit of the class applied for, as follows:(1) Where the application is for a special permit by a physician or dentist, or by any person in charge of an institution regularly conducted as a hospital or sanatorium for the care of persons in ill health, or as a home devoted exclusively to the care of aged people, a special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);(2) Where the application is for a special permit by a person engaged within the state in mechanical or manufacturing business or in scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein, or by any private individual, a special permit to purchase alcohol for the purpose named in the permit, except that the governor may waive the requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);(3) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor at a banquet, at a specified date and place, a special permit to purchase liquor for consumption at such banquet, to such applicants as may be fixed by the board;(4) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor on the premises of a business not licensed under this title, a special permit to purchase liquor for consumption thereon for such periods of time and to such applicants as may be fixed by the board;(5) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer to import or purchase within the state alcohol, malt, and other materials containing alcohol to be used in the manufacture of liquor, or other products, a special permit;(6) Where the application is for a special permit by a person operating a drug store to purchase liquor at retail prices only, to be thereafter sold by such person on the prescription of a physician, a special liquor purchase permit, except that the governor may waive the requirement for a special liquor purchase permit under this subsection pursuant to an order issued under RCW 43.06.220(2);(7) Where the application is for a special permit by an authorized representative of a military installation operated by or for any of the armed forces within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington, a special permit to purchase liquor for use on such military installation;(8) Where the application is for a special permit by a vendor that manufactures or sells a product which cannot be effectively presented to potential buyers without serving it with liquor or by a manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at a convention of a trade association composed of licensees of the board, when the said liquor is served in a hospitality room or from a booth in a board-approved suppliers' display room at the convention, and when the liquor so served is for consumption in the said hospitality room or display room during the convention, anything in this title to the contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.290, and 66.24.210;(9) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to donate liquor for a reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner for delegates and guests at a convention of a trade association composed of licensees of the board, when the liquor so donated is for consumption at the said reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner during the convention, anything in this title to the contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.290, and 66.24.210;(10) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to donate and/or serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at an international trade fair, show, or exposition held under the auspices of a federal, state, or local governmental entity or organized and promoted by a nonprofit organization, anything in this title to the contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor must be purchased from a liquor spirits retailer or distributor, and any such liquor is subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.290, and 66.24.210;(11) Where the application is for an annual special permit by a person operating a bed and breakfast lodging facility to donate or serve wine or beer without charge to overnight guests of the facility if the wine or beer is for consumption on the premises of the facility. "Bed and breakfast lodging facility," as used in this subsection, means a facility offering from one to eight lodging units and breakfast to travelers and guests;(12) Where the application is for a special permit to allow tasting of alcohol by persons at least 18 years of age under the following circumstances:(a) The application is from a community or technical college as defined in RCW 28B.50.030, a regional university, or a state university;(b) The person who is permitted to taste under this subsection is enrolled as a student in a required or elective class that is part of a culinary, sommelier, wine business, enology, viticulture, wine technology, beer technology, or spirituous technology-related degree program;(c) The alcohol served to any person in the degree-related programs under (b) of this subsection is tasted but not consumed for the purposes of educational training as part of the class curriculum with the approval of the educational provider;(d) The service and tasting of alcoholic beverages is supervised by a faculty or staff member of the educational provider who is 21 years of age or older. The supervising faculty or staff member shall possess a class 12 or 13 alcohol server permit under the provisions of RCW 66.20.310;(e) The enrolled student permitted to taste the alcoholic beverages does not purchase the alcoholic beverages;(f) The enrolled student permitted to taste the alcoholic beverages conducts the tasting either: (i) On the premises of the college or university at which the student is enrolled; or (ii) while on a field trip to a grape-growing area or production facility so long as the enrolled student is accompanied by a faculty or staff member with a class 12 or 13 alcohol server permit who supervises as provided in (d) of this subsection and all other requirements of this subsection (12) are met; and(g) The permit fee for the special permit provided for in this subsection (12) must be waived by the board;(13) Where the application is for a special permit by a distillery or craft distillery for an event not open to the general public to be held or conducted at a specific place, including at the licensed premise of the applying distillery or craft distillery, upon a specific date for the purpose of tasting and selling spirits of its own production. The distillery or craft distillery must obtain a permit for a fee of (($10))$15 per event. An application for the permit must be submitted for private banquet permits prior to the event and, once issued, must be posted in a conspicuous place at the premises for which the permit was issued during all times the permit is in use. No licensee may receive more than 12 permits under this subsection (13) each year;(14) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer of wine for an event not open to the general public to be held or conducted at a specific place upon a specific date for the purpose of tasting and selling wine of its own production. The winery must obtain a permit for a fee of (($10))$15 per event. An application for the permit must be submitted at least ten days before the event and once issued, must be posted in a conspicuous place at the premises for which the permit was issued during all times the permit is in use. No more than 12 events per year may be held by a single manufacturer under this subsection;(15) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer of beer for an event not open to the general public to be held or conducted at a specific place upon a specific date for the purpose of tasting and selling beer of its own production. The brewery or microbrewery must obtain a permit for a fee of (($10))$15 per event. An application for the permit must be submitted at least 10 days before the event and, once issued, must be posted in a conspicuous place at the premises for which the permit was issued during all times the permit is in use. No more than 12 events per year may be held by a single manufacturer under this subsection;(16) Where the application is for a special permit by an individual or business to sell a private collection of wine or spirits to an individual or business. The seller must obtain a permit at least five business days before the sale, for a fee of (($25))$37.50 per sale. The seller must provide an inventory of products sold and the agreed price on a form provided by the board. The seller shall submit the report and taxes due to the board no later than 20 calendar days after the sale. A permit may be issued under this section to allow the sale of a private collection to licensees, but may not be issued to a licensee to sell to a private individual or business which is not otherwise authorized under the license held by the seller. If the liquor is purchased by a licensee, all sales are subject to taxes assessed as on liquor acquired from any other source. The board may adopt rules to implement this section;(17)(a) A special permit, where the application is for a special permit by a nonprofit organization to sell wine through an auction, not open to the public, to be conducted at a specific place, upon a specific date, and to allow wine tastings at the auction of the wine to be auctioned.(b) A permit holder under this subsection (17) may at the specified event:(i) Sell wine by auction for off-premises consumption; and(ii) Allow tastings of samples of the wine to be auctioned at the event.(c) An application is required for a permit under this subsection (17). The application must be submitted prior to the event and once issued must be posted in a conspicuous place at the premises for which the permit was issued during all times the permit is in use.(d) Wine from more than one winery may be sold at the auction; however, each winery selling wine at the auction must be listed on the permit application. Only a single application form may be required for each auction, regardless of the number of wineries that are selling wine at the auction. The total fee per event for a permit issued under this subsection (17) is (($25))$37.50 multiplied by the number of wineries that are selling wine at the auction.(e) For the purposes of this subsection (17), "nonprofit organization" means an entity incorporated as a nonprofit organization under Washington state law.(f) The board may adopt rules to implement this section;(18) An annual special permit to allow a short-term rental operator to provide one complimentary bottle of wine to rental guests who are age 21 or over. The annual special permit fee is (($75))$112.50. A single permit applies to all rental properties owned or operated by the short-term rental operator and identified in the permit application. One complimentary bottle of wine per booking may be provided, regardless of the total number of rental guests. The provision of the complimentary bottle of wine may occur only after an operator or staff person of the short-term rental, who is present at the short-term rental property, verifies that each rental guest who will consume the complimentary bottle of wine is age 21 or over by checking a valid form of identification of each such rental guest at the time rental guests arrive. The rental guests must be informed the rental guests are being offered one complimentary bottle of wine and that opening or consuming the bottle of wine in a public place is illegal pursuant to RCW 66.44.100. The rental guests must not have notified the operator that the rental guests decline the complimentary bottle of wine. The complimentary bottle of wine may be consumed on the premises of the rental property or removed and consumed off the premises of the rental property. A permit holder may purchase wine from wine distributors in accordance with RCW 66.24.200, and from retailers and other suppliers of wine authorized under this title to sell wine at retail to consumers for off-premises consumption. For purposes of this subsection, the terms "short-term rental," "operator," and "guest" have the same meanings as in RCW 64.37.010; and(19) Where the application is for an emergency liquor permit by a licensed manufacturer to authorize the sale, service, and consumption of liquor on the premises of another liquor licensee with retail sales privileges when an emergency or disaster as defined in RCW 38.52.010 has made the premises of the applicant inaccessible and unable to operate due to an emergency or road closure, except that the fee must be waived if there is a proclamation of a state of emergency issued by the governor or by the city, town, or county where the applicant is located. The permit shall be valid for 30 days and may be continually renewed for periods of 30 days if the emergency or disaster continues. Employees or agents of the emergency permit holder or the licensed premises may serve liquor provided by the permit holder. The permit holder may store no more than a 30-day supply of liquor at the licensed premises in segregated storage. No more than a total of three emergency permit holders may sell at the same licensed premises under an emergency permit.Sec. 2. RCW 66.20.400 and 2014 c 199 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There shall be a permit known as a day spa permit to allow the holder to offer or supply, without charge, wine or beer by the individual glass to a customer for consumption on the premises. The customer must be at least ((twenty-one))21 years of age and may only be offered wine or beer if the services he or she will be receiving will last more than one hour. Wine or beer served or consumed shall be purchased from a Washington state licensed retailer. A customer may consume no more than one six ounce glass of wine or one ((twelve))12 ounce glass of beer per day under this permit. Day spas with a day spa permit may not advertise the service of complimentary wine or beer and may not sell wine or beer in any manner. Any employee involved in the service of wine or beer must complete a board-approved limited alcohol server training program.(2) For the purposes of this section, "day spa" means a business that offers at least three of the following four service categories: (a) Hair care;(b) Skin care;(c) Nail care; and(d) Body care, such as massages, wraps, and waxing.Day spas must provide separate service areas of the day spa for at least three of the service categories offered.(3) The annual fee for this permit is ((one hundred twenty-five dollars))$187.50.Sec. 3. RCW 66.24.015 and 1988 c 200 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:An application for a new annual retail license under this title shall be accompanied by payment of a nonrefundable ((seventy-five dollar))$112.50 fee to cover expenses incurred in processing the application. If the application is approved, the application fee shall be applied toward the fee charged for the license.Sec. 4. RCW 66.24.035 and 2017 c 96 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is a license called a combination spirits, beer, and wine license, to sell wine and beer, including without limitation strong beer, at retail in bottles, cans, and original containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold, and to:(a) Sell spirits in original containers to consumers for consumption off the licensed premises and to permit holders;(b) Sell spirits in original containers to retailers licensed to sell spirits for consumption on the premises, for resale at their licensed premises according to the terms of their licenses, although no single sale may exceed ((twenty-four))24 liters; and(c) Export spirits.(2) The annual fee for the combination spirits, beer, and wine license is ((three hundred sixteen dollars))$2,000 for each store.(3) For the purposes of this title, a combination spirits, beer, and wine license is a retail license, and a sale by a combination spirits, beer, and wine licensee is a retail sale only if not for resale. Nothing in this title authorizes sales by on-premise licensees to other retail licensees.(4)(a) The board may issue a combination spirits, beer, and wine license:(i) For premises comprising at least ((ten thousand))10,000 square feet of fully enclosed retail space within a single structure, including storerooms and other interior auxiliary areas but excluding covered or fenced exterior areas, whether or not attached to the structure, and only to applicants that the board determines will maintain appropriate systems for inventory management, employee training, employee supervision, and physical security of the product;(ii) For premises of a former contract liquor store; or(iii) To a holder of former state liquor store operating rights sold at auction under RCW 66.24.620.(b) License issuances and renewals are subject to RCW 66.24.010 and the regulations adopted thereunder including, without limitation, rights of cities, towns, county legislative authorities, the public, churches, schools, and public institutions to object to or prevent issuance of local liquor licenses. However, existing grocery and other retail premises over ((ten thousand))10,000 square feet licensed to sell beer and/or wine are deemed to be premises "now licensed" under RCW 66.24.010(9)(a) for the purpose of processing applications for combination spirits, beer, and wine licenses.(c) A retailer authorized to sell spirits for consumption on or off the licensed premises may accept delivery of spirits and deliver spirits in the same manner as is provided in RCW 66.24.630(3)(d).(d) For purposes of negotiating volume discounts of spirits, a group of individual retailers authorized to sell spirits for consumption off the licensed premises may accept delivery of spirits as provided in RCW 66.24.630(3)(e).(5) Each combination spirits, beer, and wine licensee must pay to the board, for deposit into the liquor revolving fund, a license issuance fee equivalent to the license issuance fee imposed on licensees selling spirits pursuant to RCW 66.24.630(4)(a).(6) The board may not issue a combined spirits, beer, and wine license to an applicant if the applicant would qualify for a restricted license as provided in RCW 66.24.371(4) or 66.24.360(7) if the applicant had applied for a license under RCW 66.24.371 or 66.24.360 instead of pursuant to this section.(7) As a condition to receiving and renewing a combination spirits, beer, and wine license the licensee must comply with RCW 66.24.630(6).(8) The maximum penalties prescribed by the board in WAC 314-29-020 through 314-29-040 relating to fines and suspensions are doubled for violations relating to the sale of spirits by combination spirits, beer, and wine licensees.(9)(a) A combination spirits, beer, and wine licensee that joins the responsible vendor program developed by the board pursuant to RCW 66.24.630(8) and maintains all of the program's requirements is not subject to the doubling of penalties provided in this section for a single violation in any period of ((twelve))12 calendar months.(b) To participate in the responsible vendor program, a combination spirits, beer, and wine licensee must submit an application form to the board. If the application establishes that the combination spirits, beer, and wine licensee meets the qualifications to join the program, the board must send the licensee a membership certificate.(c) A combination spirits, beer, and wine licensee participating in the responsible vendor program must meet the requirements in RCW 66.24.630(8)(e) and comply with board rules adopted to implement RCW 66.24.630(8).(10)(a) Any endorsement available to the holder of a license issued pursuant to RCW 66.24.360 or 66.24.371 is available, upon board approval and pursuant to board rules, to a combination spirits, beer, and wine licensee, provided that the combination spirits, beer, and wine licensee would qualify for a license and the endorsement under RCW 66.24.360 or 66.24.371, as applicable, had the licensee applied for a license and endorsement pursuant to RCW 66.24.360, 66.24.363, or 66.24.371, as applicable, instead of the combination spirits, beer, and wine license pursuant to this section. A combination spirits, beer, and wine licensee with an endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection must comply with the requirements of the endorsement to the same extent as if the endorsement was issued pursuant to RCW 66.24.360, 66.24.363, or 66.24.371, as applicable.(b) A combination spirits, beer, and wine licensee may conduct sampling in accordance with:(i) RCW 66.24.371(2) if the combination spirits, beer, and wine licensee would qualify for a license under RCW 66.24.371; or(ii) RCW 66.24.363 if the combination spirits, beer, and wine licensee would qualify for a license under RCW 66.24.360.(11) Licensees holding a combination spirits, beer, and wine license must maintain either:(a) A minimum ((three thousand dollar))$3,000 inventory of food products for human consumption, not including pop, beer, strong beer, wine, or spirits; or(b) A minimum ((three thousand dollar))$3,000 wholesale inventory of beer, strong beer, and/or wine.(12) A combination spirits, beer, and wine licensee holding a snack bar license under RCW 66.24.350 may receive an endorsement to allow the sale of confections containing more than one percent but not more than ((ten))10 percent alcohol by weight to persons ((twenty-one))21 years of age or older.(13) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.Sec. 5. RCW 66.24.055 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is a license for spirits distributors to (a) sell spirits purchased from manufacturers, distillers, or suppliers including, without limitation, licensed Washington distilleries, licensed spirits importers, other Washington spirits distributors, or suppliers of foreign spirits located outside of the United States, to spirits retailers including, without limitation, spirits retail licensees, special occasion license holders, interstate common carrier license holders, restaurant spirits retailer license holders, spirits, beer, and wine private club license holders, hotel license holders, sports entertainment facility license holders, and spirits, beer, and wine nightclub license holders, and to other spirits distributors; and (b) export the same from the state.(2) ((By January 1, 2012, the board must issue spirits distributor licenses to all applicants who, upon December 8, 2011, have the right to purchase spirits from a spirits manufacturer, spirits distiller, or other spirits supplier for resale in the state, or are agents of such supplier authorized to sell to licensees in the state, unless the board determines that issuance of a license to such applicant is not in the public interest.(3)))(a) As limited by (b) of this subsection ((and subject to (c) of this subsection)), each spirits distributor licensee must pay to the board, for deposit into the liquor revolving fund, a license issuance fee calculated as follows:(i) In each of the first ((twenty-seven))27 months of licensure, ((ten))10 percent of the total revenue from all the licensee's sales of spirits made during the month for which the fee is due, respectively; and(ii) In the ((twenty-eighth))28th month of licensure and each month thereafter, five percent of the total revenue from all the licensee's sales of spirits made during the month for which the fee is due, respectively.(b) The fee required under this subsection (((3)))(2) is calculated only on sales of items which the licensee was the first spirits distributor in the state to have received:(i) In the case of spirits manufactured in the state, from the distiller; or(ii) In the case of spirits manufactured outside the state, from an authorized out-of-state supplier.(c) ((By March 31, 2013, all persons holding spirits distributor licenses on or before March 31, 2013, must have paid collectively one hundred fifty million dollars or more in spirits distributor license fees. If the collective payment through March 31, 2013, totals less than one hundred fifty million dollars, the board must, according to rules adopted by the board for the purpose, collect by May 31, 2013, as additional spirits distributor license fees the difference between one hundred fifty million dollars and the actual receipts, allocated among persons holding spirits distributor licenses at any time on or before March 31, 2013, ratably according to their spirits sales made during calendar year 2012. Any amount by which such payments exceed one hundred fifty million dollars by March 31, 2013, must be credited to future license issuance fee obligations of spirits distributor licensees according to rules adopted by the board.(d))) A retail licensee selling for resale must pay a distributor license fee under the terms and conditions in this section on resales of spirits the licensee has purchased on which no other distributor license fee has been paid. The board must establish rules setting forth the frequency and timing of such payments and reporting of sales dollar volume by the licensee, with payments due quarterly in arrears.(((e)))(d) No spirits inventory may be subject to calculation of more than a single spirits distributor license issuance fee.(((4)))(3) In addition to the payment set forth in subsection (((3)))(2) of this section, each spirits distributor licensee renewing its annual license must pay an annual license renewal fee of ((one thousand three hundred twenty dollars))$1,980 for each licensed location.(((5)))(4) There is no minimum facility size or capacity for spirits distributor licenses, and no limit on the number of such licenses issued to qualified applicants. License applicants must provide physical security of the product that is substantially as effective as the physical security of the distribution facilities currently operated by the board with respect to preventing pilferage. License issuances and renewals are subject to RCW 66.24.010 and the regulations promulgated thereunder, including without limitation rights of cities, towns, county legislative authorities, the public, churches, schools, and public institutions to object to or prevent issuance of local liquor licenses. However, existing distributor premises licensed to sell beer and/or wine are deemed to be premises "now licensed" under RCW 66.24.010(9)(a) for the purpose of processing applications for spirits distributor licenses.Sec. 6. RCW 66.24.140 and 2021 c 6 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is a license to distillers, including blending, rectifying, and bottling; fee ((two thousand dollars))$2,100 per annum, unless provided otherwise as follows:(a) For distillers producing ((one hundred fifty thousand))150,000 gallons or less of spirits with at least half of the raw materials used in the production grown in Washington, the license fee must be reduced to ((one hundred dollars))$150 per annum;(b) The board must license stills used and to be used solely and only by a commercial chemist for laboratory purposes, and not for the manufacture of liquor for sale, at a fee of ((twenty dollars))$30 per annum;(c) The board must license stills used and to be used solely and only for laboratory purposes in any school, college, or educational institution in the state, without fee; and(d) The board must license stills that have been duly licensed as fruit and/or wine distilleries by the federal government, used and to be used solely as fruit and/or wine distilleries in the production of fruit brandy and wine spirits, at a fee of ((two hundred dollars))$300 per annum((;(e) The annual fees in this subsection (1) are waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(e); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(e);(f) The waivers in (e) of this subsection do not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220; and(g) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (e) of this subsection for the reasons described in (f) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made)).(2) Any distillery licensed under this section may:(a) Sell, for off-premises consumption, spirits of the distillery's own production, spirits produced by another distillery or craft distillery licensed in this state, or vermouth or sparkling wine products produced by a licensee in this state. A distillery selling spirits or other alcohol authorized under this subsection must comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to retailers for those products;(b) Contract distilled spirits for, and sell contract distilled spirits to, holders of distillers' or manufacturers' licenses, including licenses issued under RCW 66.24.520, or for export; and(c) Serve samples of spirits for free or for a charge, and sell servings of spirits, vermouth, and sparkling wine to customers for on-premises consumption, at the premises of the distillery indoors, outdoors, or in any combination thereof, and at the distillery's off-site tasting rooms in accordance with this chapter, subject to the following conditions:(i) A distillery may provide to customers, for free or for a charge, for on-premises consumption, spirits samples that are ((one-half)).5 ounce or less per sample of spirits, and that may be adulterated with water, ice, other alcohol entitled to be served or sold on the licensed premises under this section, or nonalcoholic mixers;(ii) A distillery may sell, for on-premises consumption, servings of spirits of the distillery's own production or spirits produced by another distillery or craft distillery licensed in this state, which must be adulterated with water, ice, other alcohol entitled to be sold or served on the licensed premises, or nonalcoholic mixers if the revenue derived from the sale of spirits for on-premises consumption under this subsection (2)(c)(ii) does not comprise more than ((thirty))30 percent of the overall gross revenue earned in the tasting room during the calendar year. Any distiller who sells adulterated products under this subsection, must file an annual report with the board that summarizes the distiller's revenue sources; and(iii) A distillery may sell, for on-premises consumption, servings of vermouth or sparkling wine products produced by a licensee in this state.(3)(a) If a distillery provides or sells spirits or other alcohol products authorized to be sold or provided to customers for on-premises or off-premises consumption that are produced by another distillery, craft distillery, or licensee in this state, then at any one time no more than ((twenty-five))25 percent of the alcohol stock-keeping units offered or sold by the distillery at its distillery premises and at any off-site tasting rooms licensed under RCW 66.24.146 may be vermouth, sparkling wine, or spirits made by another distillery, craft distillery, or licensee in this state. If a distillery sells fewer than ((twenty))20 alcohol stock-keeping units of products of its own production, it may sell up to five alcohol stock-keeping units of vermouth, sparkling wine, or spirits produced by another distillery, craft distillery, or licensee in this state.(b) A person is limited to receiving or purchasing, for on-premises consumption, no more than two ounces total of spirits that are unadulterated. Any additional spirits purchased for on-premises consumption must be adulterated as authorized in this section.(c)(i) No person under ((twenty-one))21 years of age may be on the premises of a distillery tasting room, including an off-site tasting room licensed under RCW 66.24.146, unless they are accompanied by their parent or legal guardian.(ii) Every distillery tasting room, including the off-site tasting rooms licensed under RCW 66.24.146, where alcohol is sampled, sold, or served, must include a designated area where persons under ((twenty-one))21 years of age are allowed to enter. Such location may be in a separate room or a designated area within the tasting room separated from the remainder of the tasting room space as authorized by the board.(iii) Except for (c)(iv) of this subsection, or an event where a private party has secured a private banquet permit, no person under ((twenty-one))21 years of age may be on the distillery premises, or the off-site tasting rooms licensed under RCW 66.24.146, past 9:00 p.m.(iv) Notwithstanding the limitations of (c)(iii) of this subsection, persons under ((twenty-one))21 years of age who are children of owners, operators, or managers of a distillery or an off-site tasting room licensed under RCW 66.24.146, may be in any area of a distillery, tasting room, or an off-site tasting room licensed under RCW 66.24.146, provided they must be under the direct supervision of their parent or legal guardian while on the premises.(d) Any person serving or selling spirits or other alcohol authorized to be served or sold by a distillery must obtain a class 12 alcohol server permit.(e) A distillery may sell nonalcoholic products at retail.Sec. 7. RCW 66.24.146 and 2021 c 6 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is a tasting room license available to distillery and craft distillery licensees. A tasting room license authorizes the operation of an off-site tasting room, in addition to a tasting room attached to the distillery's or craft distillery's production facility, at which the licensee may sample, serve, and sell spirits and alcohol products authorized to be sampled, served, and sold under RCW 66.24.140 and 66.24.145, for on-premises and off-premises consumption, subject to the same limitations as provided in RCW 66.24.140 and 66.24.145.(2)(((a))) A distillery or craft distillery licensed production facility is eligible for no more than two off-site tasting room licenses located in this state, which may be indoors, or outdoors or a combination thereof, and which shall be administratively tied to a licensed production facility. A separate license is required for the operation of each off-site tasting room. The fee for each off-site tasting room license is ((two thousand dollars))$2,100 per annum. No additional license is required for a distillery or craft distillery to sample, serve, and sell spirits and alcohol to customers in a tasting room on the distillery or craft distillery premises as authorized under this section, RCW 66.24.1472, 66.24.140, 66.24.145, 66.28.040, 66.24.630, and 66.28.310. Off-site tasting rooms may have a section identified and segregated as federally bonded spaces for the storage of bulk or packaged spirits. Product of the licensee's production may be bottled or packaged in the space.(((b) The annual fee in (a) of this subsection is waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (2)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (2)(b).(c) The waiver in (b) of this subsection does not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))Sec. 8. RCW 66.24.150 and 2019 c 156 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There shall be a license to manufacturers of liquor, including all kinds of manufacturers except those licensed as distillers, domestic brewers, microbreweries, wineries, and domestic wineries, authorizing such licensees to manufacture, import, sell, and export liquor from the state; fee ((five hundred dollars))$750 per annum.(2) Manufacturers licensed under this section may contract with licensed liquor distillers, craft distillers, domestic brewers, microbreweries, wineries, and domestic wineries to provide packaging services that include, but are not limited to:(a) Canning, bottling, and bagging of alcoholic beverages;(b) Mixing products before packaging; and(c) Receiving and returning products to the originating liquor licensed businesses as part of a contract.(3) Holders of a manufacturer's license:(a) May contract with other nonliquor licensed businesses if the contract does not include alcohol products;(b) May not contract directly or indirectly with any retail liquor licensee for the sale of alcohol products, unless they are medicinal, culinary, or toilet preparations not usable as beverages, as described in RCW 66.12.070;(c) May not engage in direct liquor sales to retail liquor licensees, except for the sale of alcohol products described in RCW 66.12.070; and(d) May not mix or infuse THC, CBD, or any other cannabinoid into any products containing alcohol.Sec. 9. RCW 66.24.160 and 2012 c 2 s 207 are each amended to read as follows:A spirits importer's license may be issued to any qualified person, firm or corporation, entitling the holder thereof to import into the state any liquor other than beer or wine; to store the same within the state, and to sell and export the same from the state; fee ((six hundred dollars))$2,100 per annum. Such spirits importer's license is subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by this title or by the rules and regulations of the board, and is issued only upon such terms and conditions as may be imposed by the board.Sec. 10. RCW 66.24.165 and 2020 c 210 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is a retail license to be designated as the local wine industry association license to be issued to a nonprofit society or organization specifically created with the express purpose of encouraging consumer education of and promoting the economic development for a designated area of the Washington state wine industry.(2) The local wine industry association licensee may purchase or receive donations of wine from domestic winery licensees and certificate of approval holders and use such wine for promotional or marketing purposes. Events or marketing programs conducted by the local wine industry association licensee may be held on domestic winery premises, including the premises of additional locations authorized under RCW 66.24.170(4), as long as the domestic winery and the local wine industry association licensee each separately account for the sales of its wine. Domestic wineries and additional locations authorized under RCW 66.24.170(4) are not subject to the restrictions of RCW 66.28.305, but only while participating in an event or marketing program conducted by the holder of this license.(3) The holder of the local wine industry association license must notify the board of any event or marketing program conducted under the license at least ((forty-five))45 days before the event or start of the marketing program.(4) The annual fee for the local wine industry association license is ((seven hundred dollars))$700 per calendar year.(5) Nothing in this section prohibits the holder of the local wine industry association license access to the special occasion license under RCW 66.24.380 or special permits under RCW 66.20.010.(6) Wine furnished to a nonprofit society under this section is subject to the taxes imposed under RCW 66.24.210.(7) A licensee under this section may conduct no more than ((twelve))12 events per year.(8) All licensees participating in an event or marketing program conducted under a license issued under this section are jointly responsible for any violation or enforcement issues arising out of the event or marketing program unless it can be demonstrated that the violation or enforcement issue was due to one or more licensee's specific conduct or action, in which case the violation or enforcement issue applies only to those identified licensees.Sec. 11. RCW 66.24.170 and 2021 c 6 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(((a))) There is a license for domestic wineries; fee to be computed only on the liters manufactured: Less than ((two hundred fifty thousand))250,000 liters per year, ((one hundred dollars))$150 per year; and ((two hundred fifty thousand))250,000 liters or more per year, ((four hundred dollars))$600 per year.(((b) The annual fees in (a) of this subsection are waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b).(c) The waivers in (b) of this subsection do not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))(2) The license allows for the manufacture of wine in Washington state from grapes or other agricultural products.(3) Any domestic winery licensed under this section may also act as a retailer of wine of its own production. Any domestic winery licensed under this section may act as a distributor of its own production. Notwithstanding any language in this title to the contrary, a domestic winery may use a common carrier to deliver up to ((one hundred))100 cases of its own production, in the aggregate, per month to licensed Washington retailers. A domestic winery may not arrange for any such common carrier shipments to licensed retailers of wine not of its own production. Except as provided in this section, any winery operating as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection must comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers, except that a winery operating as a distributor may maintain a warehouse off the premises of the winery for the distribution of wine of its own production provided that: (a) The warehouse has been approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; and (b) the number of warehouses off the premises of the winery does not exceed one.(4)(a) A domestic winery licensed under this section, at locations separate from any of its production or manufacturing sites, may serve samples of its own products, with or without charge, may sell wine of its own production at retail, and may sell for off-premises consumption wines of its own production in kegs or sanitary containers meeting the applicable requirements of federal law brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap at the time of sale, provided that: (i) Each additional location has been approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; (ii) the total number of additional locations does not exceed four; (iii) a winery may not act as a distributor at any such additional location; and (iv) any person selling or serving wine at an additional location for on-premises consumption must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server permit. Each additional location is deemed to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. At additional locations operated by multiple wineries under this section, if the board cannot connect a violation of RCW 66.44.200 or 66.44.270 to a single licensee, the board may hold all licensees operating the additional location jointly liable. Nothing in this subsection may be construed to prevent a domestic winery from holding multiple domestic winery licenses.(b) A customer of a domestic winery may remove from the premises of the domestic winery or from a tasting room location approved under (a) of this subsection, recorked or recapped in its original container, any portion of wine purchased for on-premises consumption.(5)(a) A domestic winery licensed under this section may apply to the board for an endorsement to sell wine of its own production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is ((seventy-five dollars))$112.50. An endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection does not count toward the four additional retail locations limit specified in this section.(b) For each month during which a domestic winery will sell wine at a qualifying farmers market, the winery must provide the board or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled wine may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board before the winery may offer wine for sale at a qualifying farmers market.(c) The wine sold at qualifying farmers markets must be made entirely from grapes grown in a recognized Washington appellation or from other agricultural products grown in this state.(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection include tasting or sampling privileges subject to the conditions pursuant to RCW 66.24.175. The winery may not store wine at a farmers market beyond the hours that the winery offers bottled wine for sale. The winery may not act as a distributor from a farmers market location.(e) Before a winery may sell bottled wine at a qualifying farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization for any winery with an endorsement approved under this subsection to sell bottled wine at retail at the farmers market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved winery may sell bottled wine; and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify the locations at which bottled wine may be sold. Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved winery to sell bottled wine at retail at its farmers market location, the board must notify the persons or entities of such application for authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under this subsection (5)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be necessary to implement this section.(g) For the purposes of this subsection:(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following minimum requirements:(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers selling their own agricultural products;(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are processors or resellers. However, if a farmers market does not satisfy this subsection (5)(g)(i)(B), a farmers market is still considered a "qualifying farmers market" if the total combined gross annual sales of farmers and processors at the farmers market is ((one million dollars))$1,000,000 or more;(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor is prohibited; and(E) No vendor is a franchisee.(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the consumer.(6) Wine produced in Washington state by a domestic winery licensee may be shipped out-of-state for the purpose of making it into sparkling wine and then returned to such licensee for resale. Such wine is deemed wine manufactured in the state of Washington for the purposes of RCW 66.24.206, and shall not require a special license.(7) During an event held by a nonprofit holding a special occasion license issued under RCW 66.24.380, a domestic winery licensed under this section may take orders, either in writing or electronically, and accept payment for wines of its own production under the following conditions:(a) Wine produced by the domestic winery may be served for on-premises consumption by the special occasion licensee;(b) The domestic winery delivers wine to the consumer on a date after the conclusion of the special occasion event;(c) The domestic winery delivers wine to the consumer at a location different from the location at which the special occasion event is held;(d) The domestic winery complies with all requirements in chapter 66.20 RCW for direct sale of wine to consumers;(e) The wine is not sold for resale; and(f) The domestic winery is entitled to all proceeds from the sale and delivery of its wine to a consumer after the conclusion of the special occasion event, but may enter into an agreement to share a portion of the proceeds of these sales with the special occasion licensee licensed under RCW 66.24.380.Sec. 12. RCW 66.24.179 and 2016 c 190 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is a wine retailer reseller endorsement to a beer and/or wine specialty shop license issued under RCW 66.24.371, to sell wine at retail in original containers to retailers licensed to sell wine for consumption on the premises, for resale at their licensed premises according to the terms of the license. However, no single sale may exceed ((twenty-four))24 liters, unless the sale is made by a licensee that was a former state liquor store or contract liquor store at the location from which such sales are made. For the purposes of this title, a beer and/or wine specialty shop license is a retail license, and a sale by a beer and/or wine specialty shop license with a reseller endorsement is a retail sale only if not for resale. The annual fee for the wine retailer reseller endorsement is ((one hundred ten dollars))$165 for each store.(2) A beer and/or wine specialty shop licensee with a wine retailer reseller endorsement issued under this section may accept delivery of wine at its licensed premises or at one or more warehouse facilities registered with the board, which facilities may also warehouse and distribute nonliquor items, and from which it may deliver to its own licensed premises and, pursuant to sales permitted by this title, to other licensed premises, to other registered facilities, or to lawful purchasers outside the state. Facilities may be registered and utilized by associations, cooperatives, or comparable groups of beer and/or wine specialty shop licensees.(3) A beer and/or wine specialty shop licensee, selling wine under the endorsement created in this section, may sell a maximum of ((five thousand))5,000 liters of wine per day for resale to retailers licensed to sell wine for consumption on the premises.Sec. 13. RCW 66.24.185 and 2008 c 41 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There shall be a license for bonded wine warehouses which shall authorize the storage and handling of bottled wine. Under this license a licensee may maintain a warehouse for the storage of wine off the premises of a winery.(2) The board shall adopt similar qualifications for a bonded wine warehouse license as required for obtaining a domestic winery license as specified in RCW 66.24.010 and 66.24.170. A licensee must be a sole proprietor, a partnership, a limited liability company, or a corporation. One or more domestic wineries may operate as a partnership, corporation, business co-op, or agricultural co-op for the purposes of obtaining a bonded wine warehouse license.(3) All bottled wine shipped to a bonded wine warehouse from a winery or another bonded wine warehouse shall remain under bond and no tax imposed under RCW 66.24.210 shall be due, unless the wine is removed from bond and shipped to a licensed Washington wine distributor. Wine may be removed from a bonded wine warehouse only for the purpose of being (a) exported from the state, (b) shipped to a licensed Washington wine distributor, (c) returned to a winery or bonded wine warehouse, or (([(d)]))(d) shipped to a consumer pursuant to RCW 66.20.360 through 66.20.390.(4) Warehousing of wine by any person other than (a) a licensed domestic winery or a bonded wine warehouse licensed under the provisions of this section, (b) a licensed Washington wine distributor, (c) a licensed Washington wine importer, (d) a wine certificate of approval holder (W7), or (e) the ((liquor control)) board, is prohibited.(5) A license applicant shall hold a federal permit for a bonded wine cellar and may be required to post a continuing wine tax bond of such an amount and in such a form as may be required by the board prior to the issuance of a bonded wine warehouse license. The fee for this license shall be ((one hundred dollars))$150 per annum.(6) The board shall adopt rules requiring a bonded wine warehouse to be physically secure, zoned for the intended use and physically separated from any other use.(7) Every licensee shall submit to the board a monthly report of movement of bottled wines to and from a bonded wine warehouse in a form prescribed by the board. The board may adopt other necessary procedures by which bonded wine warehouses are licensed and regulated.(8) Handling of bottled wine, as provided for in this section, includes packaging and repackaging services; bottle labeling services; creating baskets or variety packs that may or may not include nonwine products; and picking, packing, and shipping wine orders direct to consumer. A winery contracting with a bonded wine warehouse for handling bottled wine must comply with all applicable state and federal laws and shall be responsible for financial transactions in direct to consumer shipping activities.Sec. 14. RCW 66.24.200 and 2023 c 257 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:There shall be a license for wine distributors to sell wine, purchased from licensed Washington wineries, wine certificate of approval holders, licensed wine importers, or suppliers of foreign wine located outside of the United States, to licensed wine retailers, other wine distributors, and holders of annual special permits issued under RCW 66.20.010(18), and to export the same from the state; fee (($660))$990 per year for each distributing unit.Sec. 15. RCW 66.24.203 and 2004 c 160 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:There shall be a license for wine importers that authorizes the licensee to import wine purchased from certificate of approval holders into the state of Washington. The licensee may also import, from suppliers located outside of the United States, wine manufactured outside the United States.(1) Wine so imported may be sold to licensed wine distributors or exported from the state.(2) Every person, firm, or corporation licensed as a wine importer shall establish and maintain a principal office within the state at which shall be kept proper records of all wine imported into the state under this license.(3) No wine importer's license shall be granted to a nonresident of the state nor to a corporation whose principal place of business is outside the state until such applicant has established a principal office and agent within the state upon which service can be made.(4) As a requirement for license approval, a wine importer shall enter into a written agreement with the board to furnish on or before the ((twentieth))20th day of each month, a report under oath, detailing the quantity of wine sold or delivered to each licensed wine distributor. Failure to file such reports may result in the suspension or cancellation of this license.(5) Wine imported under this license must conform to the provisions of RCW 66.28.110 and have received label approval from the board. The board shall not certify wines labeled with names that may be confused with other nonalcoholic beverages whether manufactured or produced from a domestic winery or imported nor wines that fail to meet quality standards established by the board.(6) The license fee shall be ((one hundred sixty dollars))$240 per year.Sec. 16. RCW 66.24.240 and 2021 c 6 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(((a))) There shall be a license for domestic breweries; fee to be ((two thousand dollars))$2,100 for production of ((sixty thousand))60,000 barrels or more of malt liquor per year.(((b) The annual fee in (a) of this subsection is waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b).(c) The waiver in (b) of this subsection does not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))(2) Any domestic brewery, except for a brand owner of malt beverages under RCW 66.04.010(7), licensed under this section may also act as a distributor and/or retailer for beer of its own production. Any domestic brewery operating as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection shall comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers. A domestic brewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license may sell beer of its own production for off-premises consumption from its restaurant premises in kegs or in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the licensee at the time of sale.(3) Any domestic brewery licensed under this section may also sell beer produced by another domestic brewery or a microbrewery for on and off-premises consumption from its premises as long as the other breweries' brands do not exceed ((twenty-five))25 percent of the domestic brewery's on-tap offering of its own brands.(4) A domestic brewery may hold up to four retail licenses to operate an on or off-premises tavern, beer and/or wine restaurant, spirits, beer, and wine restaurant, or any combination thereof. This retail license is separate from the brewery license. A brewery that holds a tavern license, a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, or a beer and/or wine restaurant license shall hold the same privileges and endorsements as permitted under RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, and 66.24.420.(5) Any domestic brewery licensed under this section may contract-produce beer for a brand owner of malt beverages defined under RCW 66.04.010(7), and this contract-production is not a sale for the purposes of RCW 66.28.170 and 66.28.180.(6)(a) A domestic brewery licensed under this section and qualified for a reduced rate of taxation pursuant to RCW 66.24.290(3)(b) may apply to the board for an endorsement to sell bottled beer of its own production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is ((seventy-five dollars))$112.50.(b) For each month during which a domestic brewery will sell beer at a qualifying farmers market, the domestic brewery must provide the board or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board before the domestic brewery may offer beer for sale at a qualifying farmers market.(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in Washington.(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed to be part of the domestic brewery license for the purpose of this title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection do not include the tasting or sampling privilege of a domestic brewery. The domestic brewery may not store beer at a farmers market beyond the hours that the domestic brewery offers bottled beer for sale. The domestic brewery may not act as a distributor from a farmers market location.(e) Before a domestic brewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization for any domestic brewery with an endorsement approved under this subsection to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved domestic brewery may sell bottled beer; and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify the locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved domestic brewery to sell bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board shall notify the persons or entities of such application for authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under this subsection (6)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be necessary to implement this section.(g) For the purposes of this subsection:(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following minimum requirements:(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers selling their own agricultural products;(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are processors or resellers;(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor is prohibited; and(E) No vendor is a franchisee.(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the consumer.(7) The state board of health shall adopt rules to allow dogs on the premises of licensed domestic breweries that do not provide food service subject to a food service permit requirement.Sec. 17. RCW 66.24.244 and 2021 c 6 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(((a))) There shall be a license for microbreweries; fee to be ((one hundred dollars))$150 for production of less than ((sixty thousand))60,000 barrels of malt liquor, including strong beer, per year.(((b) The annual fee in (a) of this subsection is waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b).(c) The waiver in (b) of this subsection does not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))(2)(a) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may also act as a distributor and/or retailer for beer and strong beer of its own production.(b) Any microbrewery operating as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection must comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers, except that a microbrewery operating as a distributor may maintain a warehouse off the premises of the microbrewery for the distribution of beer provided that:(i) The warehouse has been approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; and(ii) The number of warehouses off the premises of the microbrewery does not exceed one.(c) A microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license may sell beer of its own production for off-premises consumption from its restaurant premises in kegs or in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the licensee at the time of sale.(3) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may also sell from its premises for on-premises and off-premises consumption:(a) Beer produced by another microbrewery or a domestic brewery as long as the other breweries' brands do not exceed ((twenty-five))25 percent of the microbrewery's on-tap offerings; or(b) Cider produced by a domestic winery.(4) The board may issue up to four retail licenses allowing a microbrewery to operate an on or off-premises tavern, beer and/or wine restaurant, spirits, beer, and wine restaurant, or any combination thereof.(5) A microbrewery that holds a tavern license, spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, or a beer and/or wine restaurant license holds the same privileges and endorsements as permitted under RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, and 66.24.420.(6)(a) A microbrewery licensed under this section may apply to the board for an endorsement to sell bottled beer of its own production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is ((seventy-five dollars))$112.50. However, strong beer may not be sold at a farmers market or under any endorsement which may authorize microbreweries to sell beer at farmers markets.(b) For each month during which a microbrewery will sell beer at a qualifying farmers market, the microbrewery must provide the board or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board before the microbrewery may offer beer for sale at a qualifying farmers market.(c) Any person selling or serving beer must obtain a class 12 or class 13 alcohol server permit.(d) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in Washington.(e) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed to be part of the microbrewery license for the purpose of this title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection (6) include tasting or sampling privileges subject to the conditions pursuant to RCW 66.24.175. The microbrewery may not store beer at a farmers market beyond the hours that the microbrewery offers bottled beer for sale. The microbrewery may not act as a distributor from a farmers market location.(f) Before a microbrewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization for any microbrewery with an endorsement approved under this subsection (6) to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers market. This application must include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved microbrewery may sell bottled beer; and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify the locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved microbrewery to sell bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board must notify the persons or entities of the application for authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under this subsection (6)(f) may be withdrawn by the board for any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.(g) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and approval process under this section and any additional rules necessary to implement this section.(h) For the purposes of this subsection (6):(i) "Qualifying farmers market" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 66.24.170.(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the consumer.(7) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may contract-produce beer for another microbrewer. This contract-production is not a sale for the purposes of RCW 66.28.170 and 66.28.180.(8) The state board of health shall adopt rules to allow dogs on the premises of licensed microbreweries that do not provide food service subject to a food service permit requirement.Sec. 18. RCW 66.24.246 and 2020 c 186 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is an on-premises endorsement available to any:(a) Licensed domestic winery to sell beer, produced in Washington, by the single serving for on-premises consumption; and(b) Licensed domestic brewery or microbrewery to sell wine, produced in Washington, by the single serving for on-premises consumption.(2) The holder of the endorsement is limited to three offerings of beer for a domestic winery and three offerings of wine for a domestic brewery or microbrewery.(3) The annual fee for the endorsement is ((two hundred dollars))$300 for each retail location.Sec. 19. RCW 66.24.248 and 2022 c 64 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is an endorsement available to any liquor manufacturer licensed in this state under RCW 66.24.140, 66.24.145, 66.24.170, 66.24.240, or 66.24.244 whereby the licensee may contract with licensed liquor distillers, craft distillers, domestic brewers, microbreweries, wineries, and domestic wineries licensed in this state to provide packaging services that include, but are not limited to:(a) Canning, bottling, and bagging of alcoholic beverages;(b) Mixing products before packaging;(c) Repacking of finished products into mixed consumer packs or multipacks; and(d) Receiving and returning products to the originating liquor licensed businesses as part of a contract in which the contracting liquor licensed party for which the services are being provided retains title and ownership of the products at all times.(2) Holders of the endorsement authorized under this section:(a) May contract with other nonliquor licensed businesses if the contract does not include alcohol products;(b) May not contract directly or indirectly with any retail liquor licensee for the sale of the alcohol products being packaged under this section, unless they are medicinal, culinary, or toilet preparations not usable as beverages, as described in RCW 66.12.070;(c) May not engage in direct liquor sales to retail liquor licensees on behalf of the contracted party or the contracted party's products, except for the sale of alcohol products described in RCW 66.12.070; and(d) May not mix or infuse THC, CBD, or any other cannabinoid into any products containing alcohol.(3) The board shall approve a written request for an endorsement under this section for any authorized licensee in good standing at the time of the request without further requirement for additional licensing or administrative review.(4) The annual fee for this endorsement is (($100))$150.Sec. 20. RCW 66.24.250 and 2004 c 160 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:There shall be a license for beer distributors to sell beer and strong beer, purchased from licensed Washington breweries, beer certificate of approval holders, licensed beer importers, or suppliers of foreign beer located outside of the United States, to licensed beer retailers and other beer distributors and to export same from the state of Washington; fee ((six hundred sixty dollars))$990 per year for each distributing unit.Sec. 21. RCW 66.24.261 and 2004 c 160 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:There shall be a license for beer importers that authorizes the licensee to import beer and strong beer purchased from beer certificate of approval holders into the state of Washington. The licensee may also import, from suppliers located outside of the United States, beer and strong beer manufactured outside the United States.(1) Beer and strong beer so imported may be sold to licensed beer distributors or exported from the state.(2) Every person, firm, or corporation licensed as a beer importer shall establish and maintain a principal office within the state at which shall be kept proper records of all beer and strong beer imported into the state under this license.(3) No beer importer's license shall be granted to a nonresident of the state nor to a corporation whose principal place of business is outside the state until such applicant has established a principal office and agent within the state upon which service can be made.(4) As a requirement for license approval, a beer importer shall enter into a written agreement with the board to furnish on or before the ((twentieth))20th day of each month, a report under oath, detailing the quantity of beer and strong beer sold or delivered to each licensed beer distributor. Failure to file such reports may result in the suspension or cancellation of this license.(5) Beer and strong beer imported under this license must conform to the provisions of RCW 66.28.120 and have received label approval from the board. The board shall not certify beer or strong beer labeled with names which may be confused with other nonalcoholic beverages whether manufactured or produced from a domestic brewery or imported nor shall it certify beer or strong beer which fails to meet quality standards established by the board.(6) The license fee shall be ((one hundred sixty dollars))$240 per year.Sec. 22. RCW 66.24.310 and 2012 c 2 s 111 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no person may canvass for, solicit, receive, or take orders for the purchase or sale of liquor, nor contact any licensees of the board in goodwill activities, unless the person is the representative of a licensee or certificate holder authorized by this title to sell liquor for resale in the state and has applied for and received a representative's license.(b) (a) of this subsection does not apply to: (i) Drivers who deliver spirits, beer, or wine; or (ii) domestic wineries or their employees.(2) Every representative's license issued under this title is subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed by this title or by the rules and regulations of the board; the board, for the purpose of maintaining an orderly market, may limit the number of representative's licenses issued for representation of specific classes of eligible employers.(3) Every application for a representative's license must be approved by a holder of a certificate of approval, a licensed beer distributor, a licensed domestic brewer, a licensed beer importer, a licensed microbrewer, a licensed domestic winery, a licensed wine importer, a licensed wine distributor, or by a distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirits, or of foreign-produced beer or wine, as required by the rules and regulations of the board.(4) The fee for a representative's license is ((twenty-five dollars))$50 per year.Sec. 23. RCW 66.24.320 and 2021 c 6 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:There shall be a beer and/or wine restaurant license to sell beer, including strong beer, or wine, or both, at retail, for consumption on the premises. A patron of the licensee may remove from the premises, recorked or recapped in its original container, any portion of wine or sake that was purchased for consumption with a meal.(1)(((a))) The annual fee shall be ((two hundred dollars))$300 for the beer license, ((two hundred dollars))$300 for the wine license, or ((four hundred dollars))$600 for a combination beer and wine license.(((b) The annual fees in (a) of this subsection are waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b).(c) The waivers in (b) of this subsection do not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))(2)(a) The board may issue a caterer's endorsement to this license to allow the licensee to remove from the liquor stocks at the licensed premises, only those types of liquor that are authorized under the on-premises license privileges for sale and service at event locations at a specified date and, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, place not currently licensed by the board. If the event is open to the public, it must be sponsored by a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If attendance at the event is limited to members or invited guests of the sponsoring individual, society, or organization, the requirement that the sponsor must be a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375 is waived. Cost of the endorsement is ((three hundred fifty dollars))$525.(b) The holder of this license with a catering endorsement shall, if requested by the board, notify the board or its designee of the date, time, place, and location of any catered event. Upon request, the licensee shall provide to the board all necessary or requested information concerning the society or organization that will be holding the function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.(c) The holder of this license with a caterer's endorsement may, under conditions established by the board, store liquor on the premises of another not licensed by the board so long as there is a written agreement between the licensee and the other party to provide for ongoing catering services, the agreement contains no exclusivity clauses regarding the alcoholic beverages to be served, and the agreement is filed with the board.(d) The holder of this license with a caterer's endorsement may, under conditions established by the board, store liquor on other premises operated by the licensee so long as the other premises are owned or controlled by a leasehold interest by that licensee. A duplicate license may be issued for each additional premises. A license fee of ((twenty dollars))$30 shall be required for such duplicate licenses.(3) Licensees under this section that hold a caterer's endorsement are allowed to use this endorsement on a domestic winery premises or on the premises of a passenger vessel and may store liquor at such premises under conditions established by the board under the following conditions:(a) Agreements between the domestic winery or the passenger vessel, as the case may be, and the retail licensee shall be in writing, contain no exclusivity clauses regarding the alcoholic beverages to be served, and be filed with the board; and(b) The domestic winery or passenger vessel, as the case may be, and the retail licensee shall be separately contracted and compensated by the persons sponsoring the event for their respective services.(4) The holder of this license or its manager may furnish beer or wine to the licensee's employees free of charge as may be required for use in connection with instruction on beer and wine. The instruction may include the history, nature, values, and characteristics of beer or wine, the use of wine lists, and the methods of presenting, serving, storing, and handling beer or wine. The beer and/or wine licensee must use the beer or wine it obtains under its license for the sampling as part of the instruction. The instruction must be given on the premises of the beer and/or wine licensee.(5) If the license is issued to a person who contracts with the Washington state ferry system to provide food and alcohol service on a designated ferry route, the license shall cover any vessel assigned to the designated route. A separate license is required for each designated ferry route.Sec. 24. RCW 66.24.330 and 2021 c 6 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is a beer and wine retailer's license to be designated as a tavern license to sell beer, including strong beer, or wine, or both, at retail, for consumption on the premises. Such licenses may be issued only to a person operating a tavern that may be frequented only by persons ((twenty-one))21 years of age and older.(2)(((a))) The annual fee for the license is ((two hundred dollars))$300 for the beer license, ((two hundred dollars))$300 for the wine license, or ((four hundred dollars))$600 for a combination beer and wine license. ((Licensees who have a fee increase of more than one hundred dollars as a result of this change shall have their fees increased fifty percent of the amount the first renewal year and the remaining amount beginning with the second renewal period. New licensees obtaining a license after July 1, 1998, must pay the full amount of four hundred dollars.(b) The annual fees in (a) of this subsection are waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (2)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (2)(b).(c) The waivers in (b) of this subsection do not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))(3)(a) The board may issue a caterer's endorsement to this license to allow the licensee to remove from the liquor stocks at the licensed premises, only those types of liquor that are authorized under the on-premises license privileges for sale and service at event locations at a specified date and, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, place not currently licensed by the board. If the event is open to the public, it must be sponsored by a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If attendance at the event is limited to members or invited guests of the sponsoring individual, society, or organization, the requirement that the sponsor must be a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375 is waived. Cost of the endorsement is ((three hundred fifty dollars))$525.(b) The holder of this license with a catering endorsement must, if requested by the board, notify the board or its designee of the date, time, place, and location of any catered event. Upon request, the licensee must provide to the board all necessary or requested information concerning the society or organization that will be holding the function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.(c) The holder of this license with a caterer's endorsement may, under conditions established by the board, store liquor on the premises of another not licensed by the board so long as there is a written agreement between the licensee and the other party to provide for ongoing catering services, the agreement contains no exclusivity clauses regarding the alcoholic beverages to be served, and the agreement is filed with the board.(d) The holder of this license with a caterer's endorsement may, under conditions established by the board, store liquor on other premises operated by the licensee so long as the other premises are owned or controlled by a leasehold interest by that licensee. A duplicate license may be issued for each additional premises. A license fee of ((twenty dollars))$30 is required for such duplicate licenses.(4) Licensees under this section that hold a caterer's endorsement are allowed to use this endorsement on a domestic winery premises and may store liquor at such premises under conditions established by the board under the following conditions:(a) Agreements between the domestic winery and the retail licensee must be in writing, contain no exclusivity clauses regarding the alcoholic beverages to be served, and be filed with the board; and(b) The domestic winery and the retail licensee may be separately contracted and compensated by the persons sponsoring the event for their respective services.(5) The holder of this license or its manager may furnish beer or wine to the licensee's employees free of charge as may be required for use in connection with instruction on beer and wine. The instruction may include the history, nature, values, and characteristics of beer or wine, the use of wine lists, and the methods of presenting, serving, storing, and handling beer or wine. The tavern licensee must use the beer or wine it obtains under its license for the sampling as part of the instruction. The instruction must be given on the premises of the tavern licensee.(6) Any person serving liquor at a catered event on behalf of a licensee with a caterer's endorsement under this section must be an employee of the licensee and must possess a class 12 alcohol server permit as required under RCW 66.20.310.(7) The board may issue rules as necessary to implement the requirements of this section.Sec. 25. RCW 66.24.350 and 2021 c 6 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(((1))) There shall be a beer retailer's license to be designated as a snack bar license to sell beer by the opened bottle or can at retail, for consumption upon the premises only, such license to be issued to places where the sale of beer is not the principal business conducted; fee ((one hundred twenty-five dollars))$187.50 per year.(((2)(a) The annual fee in subsection (1) of this section is waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (2)(a); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (2)(a).(b) The waiver in (a) of this subsection does not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(c) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (a) of this subsection for the reasons described in (b) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))Sec. 26. RCW 66.24.354 and 1997 c 321 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:There shall be a beer and wine retailer's license that may be combined only with the on-premises licenses described in either RCW 66.24.320 or 66.24.330. The combined license permits the sale of beer and wine for consumption off the premises.(1) Beer and wine sold for consumption off the premises must be in original sealed packages of the manufacturer or bottler.(2) Beer may be sold to a purchaser in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser and filled at the tap by the retailer at the time of sale.(3) Licensees holding this type of license also may sell malt liquor in kegs or other containers that are capable of holding four gallons or more of liquid and are registered in accordance with RCW 66.28.200.(4) The board may impose conditions upon the issuance of this license to best protect and preserve the health, safety, and welfare of the public.(5) The annual fee for this license shall be ((one hundred twenty dollars))$180.Sec. 27. RCW 66.24.360 and 2017 c 96 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is a grocery store license to sell wine and/or beer, including without limitation strong beer at retail in original containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold.(2) There is a wine retailer reseller endorsement of a grocery store license, to sell wine at retail in original containers to retailers licensed to sell wine for consumption on the premises, for resale at their licensed premises according to the terms of the license. However, no single sale may exceed ((twenty-four))24 liters, unless the sale is made by a licensee that was a contract liquor store manager of a contract-operated liquor store at the location from which such sales are made. For the purposes of this title, a grocery store license is a retail license, and a sale by a grocery store licensee with a reseller endorsement is a retail sale only if not for resale.(3) Licensees obtaining a written endorsement from the board may also sell malt liquor in kegs or other containers capable of holding less than ((five and one-half))5.5 gallons of liquid.(4) The annual fee for the grocery store license is ((one hundred fifty dollars))$550 for each store.(5) The annual fee for the wine retailer reseller endorsement is ((one hundred sixty-six dollars))$249 for each store.(6)(a) Upon approval by the board, a grocery store licensee with revenues derived from beer and/or wine sales exceeding ((fifty))50 percent of total revenues or that maintains an alcohol inventory of not less than ((fifteen thousand dollars))$15,000 may also receive an endorsement to permit the sale of beer and cider, as defined in RCW 66.24.210(6), in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser, or provided by the licensee or manufacturer, and filled at the tap by the licensee at the time of sale by an employee of the licensee holding a class 12 alcohol server permit.(b) Pursuant to RCW 74.08.580(1)(f), a person may not use an electronic benefit transfer card for the purchase of any product authorized for sale under this section.(c) The board may, by rule, establish fees to be paid by licensees receiving the endorsement authorized under this subsection (6), as necessary to cover the costs of implementing and enforcing the provisions of this subsection (6).(7) The board must issue a restricted grocery store license authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table wine, if the board finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest. In determining the public interest, the board must consider at least the following factors:(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or fortified wine at the establishment; and(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it must issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable. The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those persons objecting.(8) Licensees holding a grocery store license must maintain a minimum ((three thousand dollar))$3,000 inventory of food products for human consumption, not including pop, beer, strong beer, or wine.(9) A grocery store licensee with a wine retailer reseller endorsement may accept delivery of wine at its licensed premises or at one or more warehouse facilities registered with the board, which facilities may also warehouse and distribute nonliquor items, and from which it may deliver to its own licensed premises and, pursuant to sales permitted by this title, to other licensed premises, to other registered facilities, or to lawful purchasers outside the state. Facilities may be registered and utilized by associations, cooperatives, or comparable groups of grocery store licensees.(10) Upon approval by the board, the grocery store licensee may also receive an endorsement to permit the international export of beer, strong beer, and wine.(a) Any beer, strong beer, or wine sold under this endorsement must have been purchased from a licensed beer or wine distributor licensed to do business within the state of Washington.(b) Any beer, strong beer, and wine sold under this endorsement must be intended for consumption outside the state of Washington and the United States and appropriate records must be maintained by the licensee.(c) Any beer, strong beer, or wine sold under this endorsement must be sold at a price no less than the acquisition price paid by the holder of the license.(d) The annual cost of this endorsement is ((five hundred dollars))$750 and is in addition to the license fees paid by the licensee for a grocery store license.(11) A grocery store licensee holding a snack bar license under RCW 66.24.350 may receive an endorsement to allow the sale of confections containing more than one percent but not more than ((ten))10 percent alcohol by weight to persons ((twenty-one))21 years of age or older.(12) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.(13) Nothing in this section limits the authority of the board to regulate the sale of beer or cider or container sizes under rules adopted pursuant to RCW 66.08.030.(14) Any endorsement issued pursuant to this section or RCW 66.24.363 may be issued to a qualified combination spirits, beer, and wine licensee in accordance with RCW 66.24.035(10).(15)(a) A grocery store licensee that also holds a spirits retail license under RCW 66.24.630 may, upon board approval and pursuant to board rules, transition to a combination spirits, beer, and wine license pursuant to RCW 66.24.035.(b) An applicant that would qualify for a grocery store license under this section and a spirits retail license under RCW 66.24.630 may apply for a single license pursuant to RCW 66.24.035 instead of applying for a grocery store license under this section in addition to a spirits retail license under ((to)) RCW 66.24.630.Sec. 28. RCW 66.24.363 and 2017 c 96 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A grocery store licensed under RCW 66.24.360 may apply for an endorsement to offer beer and wine tasting under this section.(2) To be issued an endorsement, a licensee must meet the following criteria:(a) The licensee operates a fully enclosed retail area encompassing at least ((ten thousand))10,000 square feet of fully enclosed retail space within a single structure, including storerooms and other interior auxiliary areas but excluding covered or fenced exterior areas, whether or not attached to the structure, except that the board may issue an endorsement to a licensee with a retail area encompassing less than ((ten thousand))10,000 square feet if the board determines that no licensee in the community the licensee serves meets the square footage requirement and the licensee meets operational requirements established by the board by rule; and(b) The licensee has not had more than one public safety violation within the past two years.(3) A tasting must be conducted under the following conditions:(a) Each sample must be two ounces or less, up to a total of four ounces, per customer during any one visit to the premises;(b) No more than one sample of the same product offering of beer or wine may be provided to a customer during any one visit to the premises;(c) The licensee must have food available for the tasting participants;(d) Customers must remain in the service area while consuming samples; and(e) The service area and facilities must be located within the licensee's fully enclosed retail area and must be of a size and design such that the licensee can observe and control persons in the area to ensure that persons under ((twenty-one))21 years of age and apparently intoxicated persons cannot possess or consume alcohol.(4) Employees of licensees whose duties include serving during tasting activities under this section must hold a class 12 alcohol server permit.(5) Tasting activities under this section are subject to RCW 66.28.305 and 66.28.040 and the cost of sampling may not be borne, directly or indirectly, by any liquor manufacturer, importer, or distributor.(6) A licensee may advertise a tasting event only within the store, on a store website, in store newsletters and flyers, and via email and mail to customers who have requested notice of events. Advertising under this subsection may not be targeted to or appeal principally to youth.(7)(a) If a licensee is found to have committed a public safety violation in conjunction with tasting activities, the board may suspend the licensee's tasting endorsement and not reissue the endorsement for up to two years from the date of the violation. If mitigating circumstances exist, the board may offer a monetary penalty in lieu of suspension during a settlement conference.(b) The board may revoke an endorsement granted to a licensee that is located within the boundaries of an alcohol impact area recognized by resolution of the board if the board finds that the tasting activities by the licensee are having an adverse effect on the reduction of chronic public inebriation in the area.(c) RCW 66.08.150 applies to the suspension or revocation of an endorsement.(8) The board may establish additional requirements under this section to assure that persons under ((twenty-one))21 years of age and apparently intoxicated persons cannot possess or consume alcohol.(9) The annual fee for the endorsement is ((two hundred dollars))$300. The board shall review the fee annually and may increase the fee by rule to a level sufficient to defray the cost of administration and enforcement of the endorsement, except that the board may not increase the fee by more than ten percent annually.(10) The board must adopt rules to implement this section.(11) An endorsement issued pursuant to this section may be issued to a qualified combination spirits, beer, and wine licensee in accordance with RCW 66.24.035.Sec. 29. RCW 66.24.371 and 2017 c 96 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be designated as a beer and/or wine specialty shop license to sell beer, strong beer, and/or wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold, at any store other than the state liquor stores. Licensees obtaining a written endorsement from the board may also sell malt liquor in kegs or other containers capable of holding four gallons or more of liquid. The annual fee for the beer and/or wine specialty shop license is ((one hundred dollars))$150 for each store. The sale of any container holding four gallons or more must comply with RCW 66.28.200 and 66.28.220.(2) Licensees under this section may provide, free or for a charge, single-serving samples of two ounces or less to customers for the purpose of sales promotion. Sampling activities of licensees under this section are subject to RCW 66.28.305 and 66.28.040 and the cost of sampling under this section may not be borne, directly or indirectly, by any manufacturer, importer, or distributor of liquor.(3) Upon approval by the board, the beer and/or wine specialty shop licensee that exceeds ((fifty))50 percent beer and/or wine sales may also receive an endorsement to permit the sale of beer to a purchaser in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser, or provided by the licensee or manufacturer, and fill at the tap by the licensee at the time of sale. If the beer and/or wine specialty shop licensee does not exceed ((fifty))50 percent beer and/or wine sales, the board may waive the ((fifty))50 percent beer and/or wine sale criteria if the beer and/or wine specialty shop maintains alcohol inventory that exceeds ((fifteen thousand dollars))$15,000.(4) The board shall issue a restricted beer and/or wine specialty shop license, authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table wine, if the board finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest. In determining the public interest, the board shall consider at least the following factors:(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or fortified wine at the establishment; and(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable. The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those persons objecting.(5) Licensees holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop license must maintain a minimum ((three thousand dollar))$3,000 wholesale inventory of beer, strong beer, and/or wine.(6) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.(7) Any endorsement issued pursuant to this section may be issued to a qualified combination spirits, beer, and wine licensee in accordance with RCW 66.24.035.(8)(a) A beer and/or wine specialty shop licensee that also holds a spirits retail license under RCW 66.24.630 may, upon board approval and pursuant to board rules, transition to a combination spirits, beer, and wine license pursuant to RCW 66.24.035.(b) An applicant that would qualify for a beer and/or wine specialty shop license under this section and a spirits retail license under RCW 66.24.630 may apply for a single license pursuant to RCW 66.24.035 instead of applying for a beer and/or wine specialty shop license under this section in addition to a spirits retail license under RCW 66.24.630.Sec. 30. RCW 66.24.380 and 2016 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:There is a retailer's license to be designated as a special occasion license to be issued to a not-for-profit society or organization to sell spirits, beer, and wine by the individual serving for on-premises consumption at a specified event, such as at picnics or other special occasions, at a specified date and place; fee ((sixty dollars))$90 per day.(1) The not-for-profit society or organization is limited to sales of no more than ((twelve))12 calendar days per year. For the purposes of this subsection, special occasion licensees that are "agricultural area fairs" or "agricultural county, district, and area fairs," as defined by RCW 15.76.120, that receive a special occasion license may, once per calendar year, count as one event fairs that last multiple days, so long as alcohol sales are at set dates, times, and locations, and the board receives prior notification of the dates, times, and locations. The special occasion license applicant will pay the ((sixty dollars))$90 per day for this event.(2) The licensee may sell spirits, beer, and/or wine in original, unopened containers for off-premises consumption if permission is obtained from the board prior to the event.(3) In addition to offering the sale of wine by the individual serving for on-premises consumption, the licensee may sell wine in original, unopened containers for on-premises consumption if permission is obtained from the board prior to the event.(4) Sale, service, and consumption of spirits, beer, and wine is to be confined to specified premises or designated areas only.(5) Liquor sold under this special occasion license must be purchased from a licensee of the board.(6) Any violation of this section is a class 1 civil infraction having a maximum penalty of ((two hundred fifty dollars))$250 as provided for in chapter 7.80 RCW.Sec. 31. RCW 66.24.395 and 2020 c 200 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) There shall be a license that may be issued to corporations, associations, or persons operating as federally licensed commercial common passenger carriers engaged in interstate commerce, in or over territorial limits of the state of Washington on passenger trains, vessels, or airplanes. Such license shall permit the sale of spirituous liquor, wine, and beer at retail for passenger consumption within the state upon one such train passenger car, vessel, or airplane, while in or over the territorial limits of the state. Such license shall include the privilege of transporting into and storing within the state such liquor for subsequent retail sale to passengers in passenger train cars, vessels or airplanes. The fees for such master license shall be ((seven hundred fifty dollars))$1,125 per annum (class CCI-1)((: PROVIDED, That upon)). Upon payment of an additional sum of ((five dollars))$7.50 per annum per car, or vessel, or airplane, the privileges authorized by such license classes shall extend to additional cars, or vessels, or airplanes operated by the same licensee within the state, and a duplicate license for each additional car, or vessel, or airplane shall be issued((: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That such)). Such licensee may make such sales and/or service upon cars, or vessels, or airplanes in emergency for not more than five consecutive days without such license((: AND PROVIDED, FURTHER, That such)). Such license shall be valid only while such cars, or vessels, or airplanes are actively operated as common carriers for hire in interstate commerce and not while they are out of such common carrier service.(b) Alcoholic beverages sold and/or served for consumption by such interstate common carriers while within or over the territorial limits of this state shall be subject to such board markup and state liquor taxes in an amount to approximate the revenue that would have been realized from such markup and taxes had the alcoholic beverages been purchased in Washington((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the board's markup shall be applied on spirituous liquor only. Such common carriers shall report such sales and/or service and pay such markup and taxes in accordance with procedures prescribed by the board.(2) Alcoholic beverages sold and delivered in this state to interstate common carriers for use under the provisions of this section shall be considered exported from the state, subject to the conditions provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section. Interstate common carriers licensed under this section may purchase alcoholic beverages outside the territorial limits of the state of Washington and import such alcoholic beverages into the state of Washington for sales and service aboard passenger trains, vessels, or airplanes. The storage facilities for liquor within the state by common carriers licensed under this section shall be subject to written approval by the board.(3) Interstate common carriers licensed under this section may provide complimentary alcoholic beverages to passengers aboard passenger trains, vessels, or airplanes.Sec. 32. RCW 66.24.400 and 2019 c 169 s 3 and 2019 c 61 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) There shall be a retailer's license, to be known and designated as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, to sell spirituous liquor by the individual glass, beer, and wine, at retail, for consumption on the premises, including mixed drinks and cocktails compounded or mixed on the premises only. A club licensed under chapter 70.62 RCW with overnight sleeping accommodations, that is licensed under this section may sell liquor by the bottle to registered guests of the club for consumption in guest rooms, hospitality rooms, or at banquets in the club. A patron of a bona fide restaurant or club licensed under this section may remove from the premises recorked or recapped in its original container any portion of wine or sake which was purchased for consumption with a meal, and registered guests who have purchased liquor from the club by the bottle may remove from the premises any unused portion of such liquor in its original container. Such license may be issued only to bona fide restaurants and clubs, and to dining, club and buffet cars on passenger trains, and to dining places on passenger boats and airplanes, and to dining places at civic centers with facilities for sports, entertainment, and conventions, and to such other establishments operated and maintained primarily for the benefit of tourists, vacationers and travelers as the board shall determine are qualified to have, and in the discretion of the board should have, a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license under the provisions and limitations of this title.(2) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license to sell bottled wine for off-premises consumption. Spirits and beer may not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section except as provided in subsection (4) of this section. The annual fee for the endorsement under this subsection is ((one hundred twenty dollars))$180.(3) The holder of a spirits, beer, and wine license or its manager may furnish beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to the licensee's employees free of charge as may be required for use in connection with instruction on beer, wine, or spirituous liquor. The instruction may include the history, nature, values, and characteristics of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor, the use of wine lists, and the methods of presenting, serving, storing, and handling beer, wine, and spirituous liquor. The spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee must use the beer, wine, or spirituous liquor it obtains under its license for the sampling as part of the instruction. The instruction must be given on the premises of the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee.(4) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license to sell for off-premises consumption malt liquor in kegs or other containers that are capable of holding four gallons or more of liquid and are registered in accordance with RCW 66.28.200. Beer may also be sold under the endorsement to a purchaser in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the retailer at the time of sale. The annual fee for the endorsement under this subsection is ((one hundred twenty dollars))$180.(5)(a) The board shall create a soju endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license to serve soju for on-premises consumption by the bottle to tables of two or more patrons ((twenty-one))21 years of age or older. Cost of the endorsement is ((fifty dollars))$75.(b) The holder of a soju endorsement may serve soju in bottles that are ((three hundred seventy-five))375 milliliters or less. Empty bottles of soju must remain on the patron's table until the patron has left the premises of the licensee.(c) The patron of a holder of a soju endorsement may remove from the premises recapped in its original container any unused portion of soju that was purchased for consumption with a meal.(d) The board must develop additional responsible sale and service of soju training curriculum related to the provisions of the soju endorsement under this subsection (5) that includes but is not limited to certification procedures and enforcement policies. This information must be provided in both Korean and English languages to licensees holding the soju endorsement. Soju endorsement holders must ensure servers providing soju to patrons are trained in the soju curriculum developed under this subsection (5).Sec. 33. RCW 66.24.420 and 2021 c 6 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license shall be issued in accordance with the following schedule of annual fees:(a) The annual fee for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license shall be graduated ((according to the dedicated dining area and type of service provided)) as follows:Less than 50% dedicated dining area(($2,000))$2,70050% or more dedicated dining area(($1,600))$2,200Service bar only(($1,000))$1,400(b) The annual fee for the license when issued to any other spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee outside of incorporated cities and towns shall be prorated according to the calendar quarters, or portion thereof, during which the licensee is open for business, except in case of suspension or revocation of the license.(c) Where the license shall be issued to any corporation, association or person operating a bona fide restaurant in an airport terminal facility providing service to transient passengers with more than one place where liquor is to be dispensed and sold, such license shall be issued upon the payment of the annual fee, which shall be a master license and shall permit such sale within and from one such place. Such license may be extended to additional places on the premises at the discretion of the board and a duplicate license may be issued for each such additional place. The holder of a master license for a restaurant in an airport terminal facility must maintain in a substantial manner at least one place on the premises for preparing, cooking, and serving of complete meals, and such food service shall be available on request in other licensed places on the premises. An additional license fee of ((twenty-five))25 percent of the annual master license fee shall be required for such duplicate licenses.(d) Where the license shall be issued to any corporation, association, or person operating dining places at a publicly or privately owned civic or convention center with facilities for sports, entertainment, or conventions, or a combination thereof, with more than one place where liquor is to be dispensed and sold, such license shall be issued upon the payment of the annual fee, which shall be a master license and shall permit such sale within and from one such place. Such license may be extended to additional places on the premises at the discretion of the board and a duplicate license may be issued for each such additional place. The holder of a master license for a dining place at such a publicly or privately owned civic or convention center must maintain in a substantial manner at least one place on the premises for preparing, cooking, and serving of complete meals, and food service shall be available on request in other licensed places on the premises. An additional license fee of ((ten dollars))$15 shall be required for such duplicate licenses.(((e) The annual fees in this subsection (1) are waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(e); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(e).(f) The waivers in (e) of this subsection do not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(g) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (e) of this subsection for the reasons described in (f) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))(2) The board, so far as in its judgment is reasonably possible, shall confine spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses to the business districts of cities and towns and other communities, and not grant such licenses in residential districts, nor within the immediate vicinity of schools, without being limited in the administration of this subsection to any specific distance requirements.(3) The board shall have discretion to issue spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses outside of cities and towns in the state of Washington. The purpose of this subsection is to enable the board, in its discretion, to license in areas outside of cities and towns and other communities, establishments which are operated and maintained primarily for the benefit of tourists, vacationers and travelers, and also golf and country clubs, and common carriers operating dining, club and buffet cars, or boats.(4) The combined total number of spirits, beer, and wine nightclub licenses, and spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses issued in the state of Washington by the board, not including spirits, beer, and wine private club licenses, shall not in the aggregate at any time exceed one license for each ((one thousand two hundred))1,200 of population in the state, determined according to the yearly population determination developed by the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.62.030.(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, the board shall refuse a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license to any applicant if in the opinion of the board the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses already granted for the particular locality are adequate for the reasonable needs of the community.(6)(a) The board may issue a caterer's endorsement to this license to allow the licensee to remove the liquor stocks at the licensed premises, for use as liquor for sale and service at event locations at a specified date and, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, place not currently licensed by the board. If the event is open to the public, it must be sponsored by a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If attendance at the event is limited to members or invited guests of the sponsoring individual, society, or organization, the requirement that the sponsor must be a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375 is waived. Cost of the endorsement is ((three hundred fifty dollars))$525.(b) The holder of this license with a catering endorsement shall, if requested by the board, notify the board or its designee of the date, time, place, and location of any catered event. Upon request, the licensee shall provide to the board all necessary or requested information concerning the society or organization that will be holding the function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.(c) The holder of this license with a caterer's endorsement may, under conditions established by the board, store liquor on the premises of another not licensed by the board so long as there is a written agreement between the licensee and the other party to provide for ongoing catering services, the agreement contains no exclusivity clauses regarding the alcoholic beverages to be served, and the agreement is filed with the board.(d) The holder of this license with a caterer's endorsement may, under conditions established by the board, store liquor on other premises operated by the licensee so long as the other premises are owned or controlled by a leasehold interest by that licensee. A duplicate license may be issued for each additional premises. A license fee of ((twenty dollars))$30 shall be required for such duplicate licenses.(7) Licensees under this section that hold a caterer's endorsement are allowed to use this endorsement on a domestic winery premises or on the premises of a passenger vessel and may store liquor at such premises under conditions established by the board under the following conditions:(a) Agreements between the domestic winery or passenger vessel, as the case may be, and the retail licensee shall be in writing, contain no exclusivity clauses regarding the alcoholic beverages to be served, and be filed with the board; and(b) The domestic winery or passenger vessel, as the case may be, and the retail licensee shall be separately contracted and compensated by the persons sponsoring the event for their respective services.Sec. 34. RCW 66.24.425 and 2020 c 274 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The board may, in its discretion, issue a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license to a business which qualifies as a "restaurant" as that term is defined in RCW 66.24.410 in all respects except that the business does not serve the general public but, through membership qualification, selectively restricts admission to the business. For purposes of RCW 66.24.400 and 66.24.420, all licenses issued under this section shall be considered spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses and shall be subject to all requirements, fees, and qualifications in this title, or in rules adopted by the board, as are applicable to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses generally except that no service to the general public may be required.(2) No license shall be issued under this section to a business:(a) Which shall not have been in continuous operation for at least one year immediately prior to the date of its application; or(b) Which denies membership or admission to any person because of race, creed, color, national origin, sex, or the presence of any disability.(3) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license issued under this section that allows up to ((forty))40 nonclub, member-sponsored events using club liquor. Visitors and guests may attend these events only by invitation of the sponsoring member or members. These events may not be open to the general public. The fee for the endorsement is an annual fee of ((nine hundred dollars))$1,350. Upon the board's request, the holder of the endorsement must provide the board or the board's designee with the following information at least ((seventy-two))72 hours before the event: The date, time, and location of the event; the name of the sponsor of the event; and a brief description of the purpose of the event.(4) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license to sell for off-premises consumption wine vinted and bottled in the state of Washington and carrying a label exclusive to the license holder selling the wine. Spirits and beer may not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section. The annual fee for the endorsement under this section is ((one hundred twenty dollars))$180.Sec. 35. RCW 66.24.450 and 2011 c 119 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No club shall be entitled to a spirits, beer, and wine private club license:(a) Unless such private club has been in continuous operation for at least one year immediately prior to the date of its application for such license;(b) Unless the private club premises be constructed and equipped, conducted, managed, and operated to the satisfaction of the board and in accordance with this title and the regulations made thereunder;(c) Unless the board shall have determined pursuant to any regulations made by it with respect to private clubs, that such private club is a bona fide private club; it being the intent of this section that license shall not be granted to a club which is, or has been, primarily formed or activated to obtain a license to sell liquor, but solely to a bona fide private club, where the sale of liquor is incidental to the main purposes of the spirits, beer, and wine private club, as defined in RCW 66.04.010(8).(2) The annual fee for a spirits, beer, and wine private club license, whether inside or outside of an incorporated city or town, is ((seven hundred twenty dollars))$1,080 per year.(3) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine private club license that allows nonclub, member-sponsored events using club liquor. Visitors and guests may attend these events only by invitation of the sponsoring member or members. These events may not be open to the general public. The fee for the endorsement shall be an annual fee of ((nine hundred dollars))$1,350. Upon the board's request, the holder of the endorsement must provide the board or the board's designee with the following information at least ((seventy-two))72 hours prior to the event: The date, time, and location of the event; the name of the sponsor of the event; and a brief description of the purpose of the event.(4) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine private club license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and wine private club license to sell bottled wine for off-premises consumption. Spirits and beer may not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section. The annual fee for the endorsement under this section is ((one hundred twenty dollars))$180.Sec. 36. RCW 66.24.452 and 2009 c 373 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There shall be a beer and wine license to be issued to a private club for sale of beer, strong beer, and wine for on-premises consumption.(2) Beer, strong beer, and wine sold by the licensee may be on tap or by open bottles or cans.(3) The fee for the private club beer and wine license is ((one hundred eighty dollars))$270 per year.(4) The board may issue an endorsement to the private club beer and wine license that allows the holder of a private club beer and wine license to sell bottled wine for off-premises consumption. Spirits, strong beer, and beer may not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section. The annual fee for the endorsement under this section is ((one hundred twenty dollars))$180.Sec. 37. RCW 66.24.495 and 2023 c 470 s 1013 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(((a))) There shall be a license to be designated as a nonprofit arts organization license. This shall be a special license to be issued to any nonprofit arts organization which sponsors and presents productions or performances of an artistic or cultural nature in a specific theater or other appropriate designated indoor premises approved by the board. The license shall permit the licensee to sell liquor to patrons of productions or performances for consumption on the premises at these events. The fee for the license shall be ((two hundred fifty dollars))$250 per annum.(((b) The annual fee in (a) of this subsection is waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b).(c) The waiver in (b) of this subsection does not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))(2) For the purposes of this section, the term "nonprofit arts organization" means an organization which is organized and operated for the purpose of providing artistic or cultural exhibitions, presentations, or performances or cultural or art education programs, as defined in subsection (3) of this section, for viewing or attendance by the general public. The organization must be a not-for-profit corporation under chapter 24.03A RCW and managed by a governing board of not less than eight individuals none of whom is a paid employee of the organization or by a corporation sole under chapter 24.12 RCW. In addition, the corporation must satisfy the following conditions:(a) No part of its income may be paid directly or indirectly to its members, stockholders, officers, directors, or trustees except in the form of services rendered by the corporation in accordance with its purposes and bylaws;(b) Salary or compensation paid to its officers and executives must be only for actual services rendered, and at levels comparable to the salary or compensation of like positions within the state;(c) Assets of the corporation must be irrevocably dedicated to the activities for which the license is granted and, on the liquidation, dissolution, or abandonment by the corporation, may not inure directly or indirectly to the benefit of any member or individual except a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation;(d) The corporation must be duly licensed or certified when licensing or certification is required by law or regulation;(e) The proceeds derived from sales of liquor, except for reasonable operating costs, must be used in furtherance of the purposes of the organization;(f) Services must be available regardless of race, color, national origin, or ancestry; and(g) The board shall have access to its books in order to determine whether the corporation is entitled to a license.(3) The term "artistic or cultural exhibitions, presentations, or performances or cultural or art education programs" includes and is limited to:(a) An exhibition or presentation of works of art or objects of cultural or historical significance, such as those commonly displayed in art or history museums;(b) A musical or dramatic performance or series of performances; or(c) An educational seminar or program, or series of such programs, offered by the organization to the general public on an artistic, cultural, or historical subject.Sec. 38. RCW 66.24.520 and 2010 c 290 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:There shall be a grower's license to sell wine or spirits made from grapes or other agricultural products owned at the time of vinification or distillation by the licensee in bulk to holders of domestic wineries', distillers', or manufacturers' licenses or for export. The wine or spirits shall be made upon the premises of a domestic winery or craft distillery licensee and is referred to in this section as grower's wine or grower's spirits. A grower's license authorizes the agricultural product grower to contract for the manufacturing of wine or spirits from the grower's own agricultural product, store wine or spirits in bulk made from agricultural products produced by the holder of this license, and to sell wine or spirits in bulk made from the grower's own agricultural products to a winery or distillery in the state of Washington or to export in bulk for sale out-of-state. The annual fee for a grower's license shall be ((seventy-five dollars))$75. For the purpose of chapter 66.28 RCW, a grower licensee shall be deemed a manufacturer.Sec. 39. RCW 66.24.530 and 1987 c 386 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There shall be a license to be designated as a class S license to qualified duty free exporters authorizing such exporters to sell beer and wine to vessels for consumption outside the state of Washington.(2) To qualify for a license under subsection (1) of this section, the exporter shall have:(a) An importer's basic permit issued by the United States bureau of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms and a customs house license in conjunction with a common carriers bond;(b) A customs bonded warehouse, or be able to operate from a foreign trade zone; and(c) A notarized signed statement from the purchaser stating that the product is for consumption outside the state of Washington.(3) The license for qualified duty free exporters shall authorize the duty free exporter to purchase from a brewery, winery, beer wholesaler, wine wholesaler, beer importer, or wine importer licensed by the state of Washington.(4) Beer and/or wine sold and delivered in this state to duty free exporters for use under this section shall be considered exported from the state.(5) The fee for this license shall be ((one hundred dollars))$150 per annum.Sec. 40. RCW 66.24.540 and 2021 c 6 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is a retailer's license to be designated as a motel license. The motel license may be issued to a motel regardless of whether it holds any other class of license under this title. No license may be issued to a motel offering rooms to its guests on an hourly basis. The license authorizes the licensee to:(a) Sell, at retail, in locked honor bars, spirits in individual bottles not to exceed ((fifty))50 milliliters, beer in individual cans or bottles not to exceed ((twelve))12 ounces, and wine in individual bottles not to exceed ((one hundred eighty-seven))187 milliliters, to registered guests of the motel for consumption in guest rooms.(i) Each honor bar must also contain snack foods. No more than one-half of the guest rooms may have honor bars.(ii) All spirits to be sold under the license must be purchased from a spirits retailer or a spirits distributor licensee of the board.(iii) The licensee must require proof of age from the guest renting a guest room and requesting the use of an honor bar. The guest must also execute an affidavit verifying that no one under ((twenty-one))21 years of age has access to the spirits, beer, and wine in the honor bar.(b) Provide without additional charge, to overnight guests of the motel, spirits, beer, and wine by the individual serving for on-premises consumption at a specified regular date, time, and place as may be fixed by the board. Self-service by attendees is prohibited. All spirits, beer, and wine service must be done by an alcohol server as defined in RCW 66.20.300 and comply with RCW 66.20.310.(2)(((a))) The annual fee for a motel license is ((five hundred dollars))$750.(((b) The annual fee in (a) of this subsection is waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (2)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (2)(b).(c) The waiver in (b) of this subsection does not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))(3) For the purposes of this section, "motel" means a transient accommodation licensed under chapter 70.62 RCW.Sec. 41. RCW 66.24.550 and 1997 c 321 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:There shall be a beer and wine retailer's license to be designated as a beer and wine gift delivery license to solicit, take orders for, sell, and deliver beer and/or wine in bottles and original packages to persons other than the person placing the order. A beer and wine gift delivery license may be issued only to a business solely engaged in the sale or sale and delivery of gifts at retail which holds no other class of license under this title or to a person in the business of selling flowers or floral arrangements at retail. No minimum beer and/or wine inventory requirement shall apply to holders of beer and wine gift delivery licenses. The fee for this license is ((seventy-five dollars))$112.50 per year. Delivery of beer and/or wine under a beer and wine gift delivery license shall be made in accordance with all applicable provisions of this title and the rules of the board, and no beer and/or wine so delivered shall be opened on any premises licensed under this title. A beer and wine gift delivery license does not authorize door-to-door solicitation of gift wine delivery orders. Deliveries of beer and/or wine under a beer and wine gift delivery license shall be made only in conjunction with gifts or flowers.Sec. 42. RCW 66.24.570 and 2021 c 6 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(((a))) There is a license for sports entertainment facilities to be designated as a sports entertainment facility license to sell beer, wine, and spirits at retail, for consumption upon the premises only, the license to be issued to the entity providing food and beverage service at a sports entertainment facility as defined in this section. The cost of the license is ((two thousand five hundred dollars))$3,750 per annum.(((b) The annual fee in (a) of this subsection is waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b).(c) The waiver in (b) of this subsection does not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))(2) For purposes of this section, a sports entertainment facility includes a publicly or privately owned arena, coliseum, stadium, or facility where sporting events are presented for a price of admission. The facility does not have to be exclusively used for sporting events.(3) The board may impose reasonable requirements upon a licensee under this section, such as requirements for the availability of food and victuals including but not limited to hamburgers, sandwiches, salads, or other snack food. The board may also restrict the type of events at a sports entertainment facility at which beer, wine, and spirits may be served. When imposing conditions for a licensee, the board must consider the seating accommodations, eating facilities, and circulation patterns in such a facility, and other amenities available at a sports entertainment facility.(4)(a) The board may issue a caterer's endorsement to the license under this section to allow the licensee to remove from the liquor stocks at the licensed premises, for use as liquor for sale and service at event locations at a specified date and place not currently licensed by the board. If the event is open to the public, it must be sponsored by a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If attendance at the event is limited to members or invited guests of the sponsoring individual, society, or organization, the requirement that the sponsor must be a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375 is waived. Cost of the endorsement is ((three hundred fifty dollars))$525.(b) The holder of this license with catering endorsement shall, if requested by the board, notify the board or its designee of the date, time, place, and location of any catered event. Upon request, the licensee shall provide to the board all necessary or requested information concerning the society or organization that will be holding the function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.(5) The board may issue an endorsement to the beer, wine, and spirits sports entertainment facility license that allows the holder of a beer, wine, and spirits sports entertainment facility license to sell for off-premises consumption wine vinted and bottled in the state of Washington and carrying a label exclusive to the license holder selling the wine. Spirits and beer may not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section. The annual fee for the endorsement under this section is ((one hundred twenty dollars))$180.(6)(a) A licensee and an affiliated business may enter into arrangements with a manufacturer, importer, or distributor for brand advertising at the sports entertainment facility or promotion of events held at the sports entertainment facility, with a capacity of five thousand people or more. The financial arrangements providing for the brand advertising or promotion of events shall not be used as an inducement to purchase the products of the manufacturer, importer, or distributor entering into the arrangement nor shall it result in the exclusion of brands or products of other companies.(b) The arrangements allowed under this subsection (6) are an exception to arrangements prohibited under RCW 66.28.305. The board shall monitor the impacts of these arrangements. The board may conduct audits of the licensee and the affiliated business to determine compliance with this subsection (6). Audits may include but are not limited to product selection at the facility; purchase patterns of the licensee; contracts with the liquor manufacturer, importer, or distributor; and the amount allocated or used for liquor advertising by the licensee, affiliated business, manufacturer, importer, or distributor under the arrangements.(c) The board shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 30, 2008, and biennially thereafter, on the impacts of arrangements allowed between sports entertainment licensees and liquor manufacturers, importers, and distributors for brand advertising and promotion of events at the facility.Sec. 43. RCW 66.24.580 and 2021 c 6 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A public house license allows the licensee:(a) To annually manufacture no less than ((two hundred fifty))250 gallons and no more than ((two thousand four hundred))2,400 barrels of beer on the licensed premises;(b) To sell product, that is produced on the licensed premises, at retail on the licensed premises for consumption on the licensed premises;(c) To sell beer or wine not of its own manufacture for consumption on the licensed premises if the beer or wine has been purchased from a licensed beer or wine wholesaler;(d) To apply for and, if qualified and upon the payment of the appropriate fee, be licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant to do business at the same location. This fee is in addition to the fee charged for the basic public house license.(2) RCW 66.28.305 applies to a public house license.(3) A public house licensee must pay all applicable taxes on production as are required by law, and all appropriate taxes must be paid for any product sold at retail on the licensed premises.(4) The employees of the licensee must comply with the provisions of mandatory server training in RCW 66.20.300 through 66.20.350.(5) The holder of a public house license may not hold a wholesaler's or importer's license, act as the agent of another manufacturer, wholesaler, or importer, or hold a brewery or winery license.(6)(((a))) The annual license fee for a public house is ((one thousand dollars))$1,500.(((b) The annual fee in (a) of this subsection is waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (6)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (6)(b).(c) The waiver in (b) of this subsection does not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))(7) The holder of a public house license may hold other licenses at other locations if the locations are approved by the board.(8) Existing holders of annual retail liquor licenses may apply for and, if qualified, be granted a public house license at one or more of their existing liquor licensed locations without discontinuing business during the application or construction stages.Sec. 44. RCW 66.24.590 and 2021 c 6 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is a retailer's license to be designated as a hotel license. No license may be issued to a hotel offering rooms to its guests on an hourly basis. Food service provided for room service, banquets or conferences, or restaurant operation under this license must meet the requirements of rules adopted by the board.(2) The hotel license authorizes the licensee to:(a) Sell spirituous liquor, beer, and wine, by the individual glass, at retail, for consumption on the premises, including mixed drinks and cocktails compounded and mixed on the premises;(b) Sell, at retail, from locked honor bars, in individual units, spirits not to exceed ((fifty))50 milliliters, beer in individual units not to exceed ((twelve))12 ounces, and wine in individual bottles not to exceed ((three hundred eighty-five))385 milliliters, to registered guests of the hotel for consumption in guest rooms. The licensee must require proof of age from the guest renting a guest room and requesting the use of an honor bar. The guest must also execute an affidavit verifying that no one under ((twenty-one))21 years of age will have access to the spirits, beer, and wine in the honor bar;(c) Provide without additional charge, to overnight guests, spirits, beer, and wine by the individual serving for on-premises consumption at a specified regular date, time, and place as may be fixed by the board. Self-service by attendees is prohibited;(d) Sell beer, including strong beer, wine, or spirits, in the manufacturer's sealed container or by the individual drink to guests through room service, or through service to occupants of private residential units which are part of the buildings or complex of buildings that include the hotel;(e) Sell beer, including strong beer, spirits, or wine, in the manufacturer's sealed container at retail sales locations within the hotel premises;(f) Sell beer to a purchaser in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap in the restaurant area by the licensee at the time of sale;(g) Sell for on or off-premises consumption, including through room service and service to occupants of private residential units managed by the hotel, wine carrying a label exclusive to the hotel license holder;(h) Place in guest rooms at check-in, a complimentary bottle of liquor in a manufacturer-sealed container, and make a reference to this service in promotional material.(3) If all or any facilities for alcoholic beverage service and the preparation, cooking, and serving of food are operated under contract or joint venture agreement, the operator may hold a license separate from the license held by the operator of the hotel. Food and beverage inventory used in separate licensed operations at the hotel may not be shared and must be separately owned and stored by the separate licensees.(4) All spirits to be sold under this license must be purchased from a spirits retailer or spirits distributor licensee of the board.(5) All on-premises alcoholic beverage service must be done by an alcohol server as defined in RCW 66.20.300 and must comply with RCW 66.20.310.(6)(a) The hotel license allows the licensee to remove from the liquor stocks at the licensed premises, liquor for sale and service at event locations at a specified date and place not currently licensed by the board. If the event is open to the public, it must be sponsored by a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If attendance at the event is limited to members or invited guests of the sponsoring individual, society, or organization, the requirement that the sponsor must be a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375 is waived.(b) The holder of this license must, if requested by the board, notify the board or its designee of the date, time, place, and location of any event. Upon request, the licensee must provide to the board all necessary or requested information concerning the society or organization that will be holding the function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.(c) Licensees may cater events on a domestic winery, brewery, or distillery premises.(7) The holder of this license or its manager may furnish spirits, beer, or wine to the licensee's employees who are ((twenty-one))21 years of age or older free of charge as may be required for use in connection with instruction on spirits, beer, and wine. The instruction may include the history, nature, values, and characteristics of spirits, beer, or wine, the use of wine lists, and the methods of presenting, serving, storing, and handling spirits, beer, or wine. The licensee must use the liquor it obtains under its license for the sampling as part of the instruction. The instruction must be given on the premises of the licensee.(8) Minors may be allowed in all areas of the hotel where liquor may be consumed; however, the consumption must be incidental to the primary use of the area. These areas include, but are not limited to, tennis courts, hotel lobbies, and swimming pool areas. If an area is not a mixed-use area, and is primarily used for alcohol service, the area must be designated and restricted to access by persons of lawful age to purchase liquor.(9)(((a))) The annual fee for this license is ((two thousand dollars))$2,500.(((b) The annual fee in (a) of this subsection is waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (9)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (9)(b).(c) The waiver in (b) of this subsection does not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))(10) As used in this section, "hotel," "spirits," "beer," and "wine" have the meanings defined in RCW 66.24.410 and 66.04.010.Sec. 45. RCW 66.24.600 and 2021 c 6 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There shall be a spirits, beer, and wine nightclub license to sell spirituous liquor by the drink, beer, and wine at retail, for consumption on the licensed premises.(2) The license may be issued only to a person whose business includes the sale and service of alcohol to the person's customers, has food sales and service incidental to the sale and service of alcohol, and has primary business hours between 9:00 p.m. and 2:00 a.m.(3) Minors may be allowed on the licensed premises but only in areas where alcohol is not served or consumed.(4)(((a))) The annual fee for this license is ((two thousand dollars))$2,500. The fee for the license shall be reviewed from time to time and set at such a level sufficient to defray the cost of licensing and enforcing this licensing program. The fee shall be fixed by rule adopted by the board in accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.(((b) The annual fee in (a) of this subsection is waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (4)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (4)(b).(c) The waiver in (b) of this subsection does not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))(5) Local governments may petition the board to request that further restrictions be imposed on a spirits, beer, and wine nightclub license in the interest of public safety. Examples of further restrictions a local government may request are: No minors allowed on the entire premises, submitting a security plan, or signing a good neighbor agreement with the local government.(6) The total number of spirits, beer, and wine nightclub licenses are subject to the requirements of RCW 66.24.420(4). However, the board shall refuse a spirits, beer, and wine nightclub license to any applicant if the board determines that the spirits, beer, and wine nightclub licenses already granted for the particular locality are adequate for the reasonable needs of the community.(7) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.Sec. 46. RCW 66.24.610 and 2011 c 325 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:There shall be a license to allow a VIP airport lounge operator to sell or otherwise provide spirits, wine, and beer solely for consumption on the premises of a VIP airport lounge. The license described in this section allows the VIP airport lounge operator to purchase spirits from the board, and to purchase beer and wine at retail outlets, or from the manufacturer or a distributor. No licensee may serve liquor from a bar where patrons may sit to be served, but may only serve liquor from a service bar, as approved by the board. The annual fee for this license shall be ((two thousand dollars))$2,500.Sec. 47. RCW 66.24.630 and 2021 c 48 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is a spirits retail license to: Sell spirits in original containers to consumers for consumption off the licensed premises and to permit holders; sell spirits in original containers to retailers licensed to sell spirits for consumption on the premises, for resale at their licensed premises according to the terms of their licenses, although no single sale may exceed ((twenty-four))24 liters, unless the sale is by a licensee that was a contract liquor store manager of a contract liquor store at the location of its spirits retail licensed premises from which it makes such sales; and export spirits.(2) For the purposes of this title, a spirits retail license is a retail license, and a sale by a spirits retailer is a retail sale only if not for resale. Nothing in this title authorizes sales by on-sale licensees to other retail licensees. The board must establish by rule an obligation of on-sale spirits retailers to:(a) Maintain a schedule by stock-keeping unit of all their purchases of spirits from spirits retail licensees, including combination spirits, beer, and wine licensees holding a license issued pursuant to RCW 66.24.035, indicating the identity of the seller and the quantities purchased; and(b) Provide, not more frequently than quarterly, a report for each scheduled item containing the identity of the purchasing on-premises licensee and the quantities of that scheduled item purchased since any preceding report to:(i) A distributor authorized by the distiller to distribute a scheduled item in the on-sale licensee's geographic area; or(ii) A distiller acting as distributor of the scheduled item in the area.(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this subsection, the board may issue spirits retail licenses only for premises comprising at least ((ten thousand))10,000 square feet of fully enclosed retail space within a single structure, including storerooms and other interior auxiliary areas but excluding covered or fenced exterior areas, whether or not attached to the structure, and only to applicants that the board determines will maintain systems for inventory management, employee training, employee supervision, and physical security of the product substantially as effective as those of stores currently operated by the board with respect to preventing sales to or pilferage by underage or inebriated persons.(b) License issuances and renewals are subject to RCW 66.24.010 and the regulations adopted thereunder, including without limitation rights of cities, towns, county legislative authorities, the public, churches, schools, and public institutions to object to or prevent issuance of local liquor licenses. However, existing grocery premises licensed to sell beer and/or wine are deemed to be premises "now licensed" under RCW 66.24.010(9)(a) for the purpose of processing applications for spirits retail licenses.(c) The board may not deny a spirits retail license to an otherwise qualified contract liquor store at its contract location or to the holder of former state liquor store operating rights sold at auction under RCW 66.24.620 on the grounds of location, nature, or size of the premises to be licensed. The board may not deny a spirits retail license to applicants that are not contract liquor stores or operating rights holders on the grounds of the size of the premises to be licensed, if such applicant is otherwise qualified and the board determines that:(i) There is no spirits retail license holder in the trade area that the applicant proposes to serve;(ii) The applicant meets, or upon licensure will meet, the operational requirements established by the board by rule; and(iii) The licensee has not committed more than one public safety violation within the three years preceding application.(d) A retailer authorized to sell spirits for consumption on or off the licensed premises may accept delivery of spirits at its licensed premises, at another licensed premises as designated by the retailer, or at one or more warehouse facilities registered with the board, which facilities may also warehouse and distribute nonliquor items, and from which the retailer may deliver to its own licensed premises and, pursuant to sales permitted under subsection (1) of this section:(i) To other retailer premises licensed to sell spirits for consumption on the licensed premises;(ii) To other registered facilities; or(iii) To lawful purchasers outside the state. The facilities may be registered and utilized by associations, cooperatives, or comparable groups of retailers, including at least one retailer licensed to sell spirits.(e) For purposes of negotiating volume discounts, a group of individual retailers authorized to sell spirits for consumption off the licensed premises may accept delivery of spirits at their individual licensed premises or at any one of the individual licensee's premises, or at a warehouse facility registered with the board.(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 66.24.632, section 2, chapter 48, Laws of 2021, or in (b) of this subsection, each spirits retail licensee must pay to the board, for deposit into the liquor revolving fund, a license issuance fee equivalent to ((seventeen))17 percent of all spirits sales revenues under the license, exclusive of taxes collected by the licensee and of sales of items on which a license fee payable under this section has otherwise been incurred. The board must establish rules setting forth the timing of such payments and reporting of sales dollar volume by the licensee, with payments required quarterly in arrears. The first payment is due October 1, 2012.(b) This subsection (4) does not apply to craft distilleries for sales of spirits of the craft distillery's own production.(5) In addition to the payment required under subsection (4) of this section, each licensee must pay an annual license renewal fee of ((one hundred sixty-six dollars))$550. The board must periodically review and adjust the renewal fee as may be required to maintain it as comparable to annual license renewal fees for licenses to sell beer and wine not for consumption on the licensed premises. If required by law at the time, any increase of the annual renewal fee becomes effective only upon ratification by the legislature.(6) As a condition to receiving and renewing a spirits retail license the licensee must provide training as prescribed by the board by rule for individuals who sell spirits or who manage others who sell spirits regarding compliance with laws and regulations regarding sale of spirits, including without limitation the prohibitions against sale of spirits to individuals who are underage or visibly intoxicated. The training must be provided before the individual first engages in the sale of spirits and must be renewed at least every five years. The licensee must maintain records documenting the nature and frequency of the training provided. An employee training program is presumptively sufficient if it incorporates a "responsible vendor program" adopted by the board.(7) The maximum penalties prescribed by the board in WAC 314-29-020 through 314-29-040 relating to fines and suspensions are doubled for violations relating to the sale of spirits by spirits retail licensees.(8)(a) The board must adopt regulations concerning the adoption and administration of a compliance training program for spirits retail licensees, to be known as a "responsible vendor program," to reduce underage drinking, encourage licensees to adopt specific best practices to prevent sales to minors, and provide licensees with an incentive to give their employees ongoing training in responsible alcohol sales and service.(b) Licensees who join the responsible vendor program under this section and maintain all of the program's requirements are not subject to the doubling of penalties provided in this section for a single violation in any period of twelve calendar months.(c) The responsible vendor program must be free, voluntary, and self-monitoring.(d) To participate in the responsible vendor program, licensees must submit an application form to the board. If the application establishes that the licensee meets the qualifications to join the program, the board must send the licensee a membership certificate.(e) A licensee participating in the responsible vendor program must at a minimum:(i) Provide ongoing training to employees;(ii) Accept only certain forms of identification for alcohol sales;(iii) Adopt policies on alcohol sales and checking identification;(iv) Post specific signs in the business; and(v) Keep records verifying compliance with the program's requirements.(f)(i) A spirits retail licensee that also holds a grocery store license under RCW 66.24.360 or a beer and/or wine specialty shop license under RCW 66.24.371 may, upon board approval and pursuant to board rules, transition to a combination spirits, beer, and wine license pursuant to RCW 66.24.035.(ii) An applicant that would qualify for a spirits retail license under this section and that qualifies for a combination spirits, beer, and wine license pursuant to RCW 66.24.035 may apply for a license pursuant to RCW 66.24.035 instead of applying for a spirits retail license under this section.Sec. 48. RCW 66.24.650 and 2021 c 6 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(((a))) There is a theater license to sell beer, including strong beer, or wine, or both, at retail, for consumption on theater premises. The annual fee is ((four hundred dollars))$600 for a beer and wine theater license.(((b) The annual fee in (a) of this subsection is waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b).(c) The waiver in (b) of this subsection does not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))(2) If the theater premises is to be frequented by minors, an alcohol control plan must be submitted to the board at the time of application. The alcohol control plan must be approved by the board, and be prominently posted on the premises, prior to minors being allowed.(3) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Alcohol control plan" means a written, dated, and signed plan submitted to the board by an applicant or licensee for the entire theater premises, or rooms or areas therein, that shows where and when alcohol is permitted, where and when minors are permitted, and the control measures used to ensure that minors are not able to obtain alcohol or be exposed to environments where drinking alcohol predominates.(b) "Theater" means a place of business where motion pictures or other primarily nonparticipatory entertainment are shown, and includes only theaters with up to four screens.(4) The board must adopt rules regarding alcohol control plans and necessary control measures to ensure that minors are not able to obtain alcohol or be exposed to areas where drinking alcohol predominates. All alcohol control plans must include a requirement that any person involved in the serving of beer and/or wine must have completed a mandatory alcohol server training program.(5)(a) A licensee that is an entity that is exempt from taxation under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended as of January 1, 2013, may enter into arrangements with a beer or wine manufacturer, importer, or distributor for brand advertising at the theater or promotion of events held at the theater. The financial arrangements providing for the brand advertising or promotion of events may not be used as an inducement to purchase the products of the manufacturer, importer, or distributor entering into the arrangement and such arrangements may not result in the exclusion of brands or products of other companies.(b) The arrangements allowed under this subsection (5) are an exception to arrangements prohibited under RCW 66.28.305. The board must monitor the impacts of these arrangements. The board may conduct audits of a licensee and the affiliated business to determine compliance with this subsection (5). Audits may include, but are not limited to: Product selection at the facility; purchase patterns of the licensee; contracts with the beer or wine manufacturer, importer, or distributor; and the amount allocated or used for wine or beer advertising by the licensee, affiliated business, manufacturer, importer, or distributor under the arrangements.(6) The maximum penalties prescribed by the board in WAC 314-29-020 relating to fines and suspensions are double for violations involving minors or the failure to follow the alcohol control plan with respect to theaters licensed under this section.Sec. 49. RCW 66.24.655 and 2021 c 6 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(((a))) There is a theater license to sell spirits, beer, including strong beer, or wine, or all, at retail, for consumption on theater premises. A spirits, beer, and wine theater license may be issued only to theaters that have no more than ((one hundred twenty))120 seats per screen and that are maintained in a substantial manner as a place for preparing, cooking, and serving complete meals and providing tabletop accommodations for in-theater dining. Requirements for complete meals are the same as those adopted by the board in rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license authorized by RCW 66.24.400. The annual fee for a spirits, beer, and wine theater license is ((two thousand dollars))$2,500.(((b) The annual fee in (a) of this subsection is waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (1)(b).(c) The waiver in (b) of this subsection does not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))(2) If the theater premises is to be frequented by minors, an alcohol control plan must be submitted to the board at the time of application. The alcohol control plan must be approved by the board and be prominently posted on the premises, prior to minors being allowed.(3) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Alcohol control plan" means a written, dated, and signed plan submitted to the board by an applicant or licensee for the entire theater premises, or rooms or areas therein, that shows where and when alcohol is permitted, where and when minors are permitted, and the control measures used to ensure that minors are not able to obtain alcohol or be exposed to environments where drinking alcohol predominates.(b) "Theater" means a place of business where motion pictures or other primarily nonparticipatory entertainment are shown.(4) The board must adopt rules regarding alcohol control plans and necessary control measures to ensure that minors are not able to obtain alcohol or be exposed to areas where drinking alcohol predominates. All alcohol control plans must include a requirement that any person involved in the serving of spirits, beer, and/or wine must have completed a mandatory alcohol server training program.(5)(a) A licensee that is an entity that is exempt from taxation under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended as of January 1, 2013, may enter into arrangements with a spirits, beer, or wine manufacturer, importer, or distributor for brand advertising at the theater or promotion of events held at the theater. The financial arrangements providing for the brand advertising or promotion of events may not be used as an inducement to purchase the products of the manufacturer, importer, or distributor entering into the arrangement and such arrangements may not result in the exclusion of brands or products of other companies.(b) The arrangements allowed under this subsection (5) are an exception to arrangements prohibited under RCW 66.28.305. The board must monitor the impacts of these arrangements. The board may conduct audits of a licensee and the affiliated business to determine compliance with this subsection (5). Audits may include, but are not limited to: Product selection at the facility; purchase patterns of the licensee; contracts with the spirits, beer, or wine manufacturer, importer, or distributor; and the amount allocated or used for spirits, beer, or wine advertising by the licensee, affiliated business, manufacturer, importer, or distributor under the arrangements.(6) The maximum penalties prescribed by the board in WAC 314-29-020 relating to fines and suspensions are double for violations involving minors or the failure to follow the alcohol control plan with respect to theaters licensed under this section.Sec. 50. RCW 66.24.680 and 2021 c 176 s 5235 and 2021 c 6 s 18 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) There shall be a license to be designated as a senior center license. This shall be a license issued to a nonprofit organization whose primary service is providing recreational and social activities for seniors on the licensed premises. This license shall permit the licensee to sell spirits by the individual glass, including mixed drinks and cocktails mixed on the premises only, beer and wine, at retail for consumption on the premises.(2) To qualify for this license, the applicant entity must:(a) Be a nonprofit organization under chapter 24.03A RCW;(b) Be open at times and durations established by the board; and(c) Provide limited food service as defined by the board.(3) All alcohol servers must have a valid mandatory alcohol server training permit.(4) The board shall adopt rules to implement this section.(5)(((a))) The annual fee for this license shall be ((seven hundred twenty dollars))$720.(((b) The annual fee in (a) of this subsection is waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (5)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (5)(b).(c) The waiver in (b) of this subsection does not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))Sec. 51. RCW 66.24.690 and 2021 c 6 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There shall be a caterer's license to sell spirits, beer, and wine, by the individual serving, at retail, for consumption on the premises at an event location that is either owned, leased, or operated either by the caterer or the sponsor of the event for which catering services are being provided. If the event is open to the public, it must be sponsored by a society or organization as defined in RCW 66.24.375. If attendance at the event is limited to members or invited guests of the sponsoring individual, society, or organization, the requirement that the sponsor must be a society or organization as defined in RCW 66.24.375 is waived. The licensee must serve food as required by rules of the board.(2)(((a))) The annual fee is ((two hundred dollars))$300 for the beer license, ((two hundred dollars))$300 for the wine license, or ((four hundred dollars))$600 for a combination beer and wine license. The annual fee for a combined beer, wine, and spirits license is ((one thousand dollars))$1,500.(((b) The annual fees in (a) of this subsection are waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (2)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (2)(b).(c) The waivers in (b) of this subsection do not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.))(3) The holder of this license shall notify the board or its designee of the date, time, place, and location of any catered event at which liquor will be served, sold, or consumed. The board shall create rules detailing notification requirements. Upon request, the licensee shall provide to the board all necessary or requested information concerning the individual, society, or organization that will be holding the catered function at which the caterer's liquor license will be utilized.(4) The holder of this license may, under conditions established by the board, store liquor on other premises operated by the licensee so long as the other premises are owned or controlled by a leasehold interest by that licensee.(5) The holder of this license is prohibited from catering events at locations that are already licensed to sell liquor under this chapter.(6) The holder of this license is responsible for all sales, service, and consumption of alcohol at the location of the catered event.Sec. 52. RCW 66.24.695 and 2017 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There shall be a bonded and nonbonded spirits warehouse license for spirits warehouses that authorizes the storage and handling of bonded bulk spirits and, to the extent allowed under federal law and under rules adopted by the board, bottled spirits and the storage of tax-paid spirits not in bond. Under this license a licensee may maintain a warehouse for the storage of federally authorized spirits off the premises of a distillery for distillers qualified under RCW 66.24.140, 66.24.145, or 66.24.150, or entities otherwise licensed and permitted in this state, or bulk spirits transferred in bond from out-of-state distilleries and, to the extent allowed by federal law and under rules adopted by the board, bottled spirits, if the storage of the federally authorized spirits transferred into the state is for storage only and not for processing or bottling in the bonded spirits warehouse. A licensee must designate clearly in its license application to the board the sections of the warehouse that are bonded and nonbonded with a physical separation between such spaces. Only spirits in bond may be stored in the bonded sections of the warehouse and only spirits that have been removed from bond tax-paid may be stored in nonbonded areas of the warehouse. The proprietor of the warehouse must maintain a plan for tracking spirits being stored in the warehouse to ensure compliance with relevant bonding and tax obligations.(2) The board must adopt similar qualifications for a spirits warehouse licensed under this section as required for obtaining a distillery license as specified in RCWÂ  66.24.140,Â  66.24.145, and 66.24.150. A licensee must be a sole proprietor, a partnership, a limited liability company, a corporation, a port authority, a city, a county, or any other public entity or subdivision of the state that elects to license a bonded spirits warehouse as an agricultural or economic development activity. One or more domestic distilleries or manufacturers may operate as a partnership, corporation, business co-op, cotenant, or agricultural co-op for the purpose of obtaining a bonded and nonbonded spirits warehouse license or storing spirits in the facility under a common management and oversight agreement free of charge or for a fee.(3) Spirits in bond may be removed from a bonded spirits warehouse for the purpose of being:(a) Exported from the state;(b) Returned to a distillery or spirits warehouse licensed under this section; or(c) Transferred to a distillery, spirits warehouse licensed under this section, or a licensed bottling or packaging facility.(4) Bottled spirits that are being removed from a spirits warehouse licensed under this section tax-paid may be:(a) Transferred back to the distillery that produced them;(b) Shipped to a licensed Washington spirits distributor;(c) Shipped to a licensed Washington spirits retailer;(d) Exported from the state; or(e) Removed for direct shipping to a consumer pursuant to RCW 66.20.410.(5) The ownership and operation of a spirits warehouse facility licensed under this section may be by a person or entity other than those described in this section acting in a commercial warehouse management position under contract for such licensed persons or entities on their behalf.(6) A license applicant must demonstrate the right to have warehoused spirits under a valid federal permit held by a licensee who maintains ownership and title to the spirits while they are in storage in the spirits warehouse licensed under this section. The fee for this license is ((one hundred dollars))$150 per year.(7) The board must adopt rules requiring a spirits warehouse licensed under this section to be physically secure, zoned for the intended use, and physically separated from any other use.(8) The operator or licensee operating a spirits warehouse licensed under this section must submit to the board a monthly report of movement of spirits to and from a warehouse licensed under this section in a form prescribed by the board. The board may adopt other necessary procedures by which such warehouses are licensed and regulated.(9) The board may require a single annual permit valid for a full calendar year issued to each licensee or entity warehousing spirits under this section that allows for unlimited transfers to and from such warehouse within that year. The fee for this permit is ((one hundred dollars))$150 per year.(10) Handling of bottled spirits that have been removed from bond tax-paid and that reside in the spirits warehouse licensed under this section includes packaging and repackaging services; bottle labeling services; creating baskets or variety packs that may or may not include nonspirits products; and picking, packing, and shipping spirits orders on behalf of a licensed distillery direct to consumers in accordance with RCW 66.20.410. A distillery contracting with the operator of a spirits warehouse licensed under this section for handling bottled spirits must comply with all applicable state and federal laws and is responsible for financial transactions in direct to consumer shipping activities.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 53. A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the board must increase by 50 percent the license, permit, or endorsement fee for any liquor license, permit, or endorsement in which the amount of such fee is determined by the board in rule.(2) The board must increase the fee set pursuant to RCW 66.20.010(3) to $25.--- END ---